[1]         
This trial deals with three principal issues: (1)
equalization of net family property; (2) the Respondent’s unjust enrichment claim
to a property owned by the Applicant; and (3) the Respondent’s claim for
spousal support.  Mid-trial, the Respondent withdrew his position on date of
separation, and he settled the claims he had in relation to the Added
Respondent (except costs).
[2]         
While there are only three principal issues, the
sub-issues are numerous and complex.  To put this case in context, I begin with
a high-level overview, followed by a more specific factual summary.  I then
turn to the issues and analysis.
[3]         
This family enjoyed significant inter-generational
wealth.  It was a product of the Applicant’s father’s successful business. 
Neither party worked in this business nor contributed towards its significant value.
[4]         
Before the parties’ marriage, the Applicant’s
father settled a trust as part of his estate planning.  It held shares in his business. 
The Applicant was the sole beneficiary and would acquire its assets at the age
of 39.  The shares were worth approximately $16M[1]
at the date of marriage.
[5]         
The parties married without a marriage contract.
 During the marriage, and before turning 39, the Applicant received the shares
from the trust.  She owned them outright.
[6]          
Eight years after she received them, the shares
were the subject of an estate freeze.  There is a dispute as to whether this
estate freeze was directed by the Applicant’s father, or the Applicant
initiated the estate freeze herself for her own benefit.
[7]          
The estate freeze involved the following
transactions.  The Applicant’s father settled a new trust for $100.  A new
holding company was created.  The Applicant sold her shares to this new holding
company, and in exchange, she received $24.5M in preferred shares.    The new
trust purchased common shares in the holding company for $100.  As such, the
new trust was entitled to the future growth in value of the shares held by the
holding company.  The beneficiaries under the new trust were the Applicant and the
parties’ four children.  At the time the parties separated, the new trust was
valued at roughly $670M.
[8]         
During the marriage and following the estate
freeze, the Applicant received income from various sources.  Principally, it
came from dividends and redemption of her preferred shares in the holding
company, and dividends and lump sum distributions from the new trust.   Funds
from the new trust were the most significant source of family income.
[9]         
The Respondent submits that the entire value of
the shares held by the new trust on the date of separation is subject to
equalization.
[10]          
The Applicant disagrees.  She argued:
[11]          
There are many other disputed items in the
parties’ respective net family property (“NFP”) statements.  The Applicant also
seeks a credit for post-separation adjustments.
[12]          
The Respondent also makes an unjust enrichment claim
to a cottage property and a condo in Florida.
[13]          
The Respondent claims spousal support.  However,
if he is awarded an equalization payment of $50M or more, he does not seek
spousal support.  The Applicant disputes the Respondent’s entitlement.  If he
is entitled, the parties disagree on the Applicant’s income for support
purposes.
[14]          
The most significant issue is the treatment of
the Applicant’s interest in property arising from the estate freeze.  Several
Ontario cases have dealt with this issue. I provide a general description of
estate freezes to provide context around the particular estate freeze in this
case.
[15]          
Owners of a family business often establish an
estate freeze. An estate freeze permits an owner to defer the tax payable on the
deemed disposition that arises upon the owner’s death, and to pass wealth on to
subsequent generations in a tax efficient manner.
[16]          
Generally, an estate freeze involves three
transactions.  First, a trust is settled.
[17]          
Next, an owner of shares (the “Freezor”) will
transfer the future growth in value of the shares (“Former Shares”) to a new holding
company. In exchange, the Freezor receives fixed value preferred shares.  The
fair market value of the Former Shares at the time of the transaction determines
the fixed value of the preferred shares.  The holding company thus holds the
future growth in the Former Shares.
[18]          
Then, the holding company will issue common
shares.  They are acquired by the trust for a nominal amount.  The trust thereby
acquires the future growth in the Former Shares by virtue of its ownership of
the common shares in the holding company.  The distribution of that future
growth will depend on the terms of the trust.
[19]          
The Freezor, by virtue of their ownership of
preferred shares in the holding company, is entitled to dividends and may also redeem
their fixed value preferred shares in the holding company. The Freezor may or
may not be (a) the settlor of the trust; (b) a trustee of the trust; and (c) a
beneficiary of the trust.
[20]          
In this case, the Applicant did not settle the
trust, but she was one of the trustees of the trust, and she was one of five
discretionary beneficiaries.
[21]          
The Canada Revenue Agency’s (“CRA”) longstanding
position on estate freezes is that they achieve the government’s objective of
encouraging tax efficient succession of family businesses. If the estate freeze
transaction satisfies all of the CRA’s administrative requirements, the CRA will
accept that the fair market value of the preferred shares is equal to their
redemption and retraction amount. Consequently, the growth shares will have a
nominal fair market value at the time of their issuance and can be acquired by
the trust for a nominal amount.
[22]          
For Canadian income tax purposes, a trust will
be deemed to have disposed of its capital property on the 21st
anniversary of the date of its creation (the “21-year rule”).  The proceeds of
the trust deemed to have been received on this disposition, would be equal to
the fair market value of the capital property on the 21st
anniversary.   To avoid this deemed disposition and the associated tax
consequences, most trustees will distribute the trust’s capital property to the
trust’s beneficiaries before the trust’s 21st anniversary.  In most
cases, such a distribution can be made on a tax-deferred basis and the beneficiaries
will thereby not pay tax on any accrued gains on capital property until they dispose
of it (including a deemed disposition on a beneficiary’s death).
[23]          
Regrettably, the parties were unable to agree on
an Agreed Statement of Facts.  As a result, there was significant evidence on events,
valuations, and the structure of transactions. Some of the parties’ positions
changed during trial.
[24]          
With no disrespect to the parties or their
family members, I refer to these individuals by their first name.  This is how
they were often referred to at trial.  This will assist the reader in
distinguishing among individuals who share the same surname.
[25]          
The Applicant, Barbara Lang-Newlands (“Barb”) is
the daughter of Gordon S. Lang (“Gordon”).  Barb has three siblings, Don Lang,
Stuart Lang, and Sherry Lang.  Collectively, I refer to them as Gordon’s
children.
[26]          
On August 21, 1987, the Respondent, Ian Newlands
(“Ian”), married Barb.   They separated on July 31, 2019.  The parties did not
enter into a domestic contract before separation.
[27]          
The parties have four children: Wesley, Spencer,
Harrison, and Jordan.  At the date of separation, they were all adults.
[28]          
Don Lang was a witness at trial.  He was very
involved in Gordon’s business and gave significant evidence about its history. 
Gordon passed away in December 2001.
[29]          
Some of Don’s recounting of Gordon’s business and
its history was hearsay and is not relevant to the factual and legal
determinations I must make.  I recount some of it nonetheless because it provides
a contextual narrative into the origins of this family’s wealth.  Other parts
of Don’s hearsay evidence are relevant to issues I must decide.  I later assess
whether it meets the principled exception to the hearsay rule of necessity and
reliability.
[30]          
Gordon was an electrical engineer.  He worked
with his father, Stuart Lang (Senior), in an electrical business, named Samson
Dominion, that manufactured toasters, kettles, and similar items.
[31]          
In 1951, Gordon and his father started a new aerosol
business with a company in Connecticut called Connecticut Chemicals Limited, or
CCL.
[32]          
Gordon led this business, CCL Industries (“CCL”)[2], with great success.  CCL
was a publicly traded company.  By the 1970s, CCL had multiple manufacturing
plants.  CCL acquired its largest competitors in Canada, and ultimately became
the largest aerosol manufacturer in southern Ontario.  The customers that CCL
manufactured products for included Proctor & Gamble, Unilever, and Colgate
Palmolive, who in turn sold those products to retailers.
[33]          
CCL underwent significant changes in the 1970s as
awareness grew about the detrimental effect that chlorofluorocarbons (“CFCs”) in
aerosol cans had on the ozone layer.  CFCs were later prohibited in Canada.
[34]          
This led to significant changes in CCL’s
manufacturing and safety protocols in the 1970s.  During this time, Gordon sought
legal advice on the structure of CCL from Bud Estey (as he then was), Albert
Gnat, and Arnold Englander.  On their advice, Gordon bought back all of the
shares in CCL to make it a private company. This resulted in significant business
debt and the value of the CCL shares was low.
[35]          
Gordon initiated the first estate freeze involving
CCL shares in 1977 and it involved the following:
[36]          
Before marriage, Gordon settled the BJL Trust for
$100.  Barb was the sole irrevocable beneficiary.  The Trustees were Gordon,
Arnold Englander, and Albert Gnat.  The Trustees were to be possessed of the capital
and income of the trust fund and were bound to pay and transfer it to Barb at
age 39 “for her own use absolutely.”
[37]          
At some point before June 25, 1986, 361588
Ontario Ltd. (“361”) was created.  361 owned directly or indirectly shares in
CCL worth about $100M.  Gordon was the sole owner of 361.
[38]          
Prior to June 25, 1986, the Trustees of the BJL
Trust purchased 90 of the 450 issued and outstanding common shares of 361 (i.e.,
20% of the common shares).  At the time, CCL was a private corporation.
[39]          
Gordon settled a trust for each of his other
three children.  Similarly, those trusts each acquired 90 common shares (or
20%) of 361.  The remaining 90 common shares of 361 (or 20%) were held by
532712 Ontario Ltd. (“532”). Gordon owned 532 and it held 991 voting special
shares of 361.  Consistent with Don’s evidence, 532 was the control corporation
that exercised voting control over Gordon’s business.  It was in place by at
least June 25, 1986.
[40]          
Between June 1986 and February 1987, a series of
corporate amalgamations and transactions occurred.  The net result is that a
new numbered company, 702303 Ontario Inc. (“702”) acquired all 450 of the common shares once issued by 361 or its
successors.
[41]          
As a result, by February 1987, prior to the
parties’ marriage, the BJL Trust held 90 common shares of 702, which in turn held
shares in CCL. Gordon retained voting control of 702 through his 991 voting
special shares.
[42]          
In addition to the BJL Trust, on the parties’ date
of marriage, Barb was one of four discretionary beneficiaries of the Gordon S.
Lang Family Trust (“GSL Trust”).  The other beneficiaries were Gordon’s three other
children.  The GSL Trust’s asset on the date of marriage was a promissory note
for $18,051,911.
[43]          
Don testified that in 1993, Gordon had a health
issue that he thought was cancer.  He stated that this exacerbated Gordon’s concerns
about his estate planning and prompted him to distribute the assets held in each
child’s trust, before the usual 21 years for an estate freeze.
[44]          
On October 28, 1993, the BJL Trust distributed its
90 common shares of 702 to Barb.  This occurred during the marriage and before Barb
turned 39 (Barb was 36 years old at the time of distribution).
[45]          
On October 29, 1993, the day after the
distribution of the BJL Trust, Gordon, his four children, 702, and another
related company, 723960 Ontario Ltd. (“723”), entered into a Transfer of Share
Ownership Agreement (“1993 Agreement”). In the preamble, it
notes that each of Gordon’s four children were the principal beneficiaries of
four separate trusts, that each trust held capital of 90 common shares in 702,
and that those shares have now been distributed to each of the four siblings.
[46]          
The 1993 Agreement can fairly be summarized as achieving
the following:
[47]          
According to Don, the 1993 Agreement was the
“cornerstone of all the planning going forward in this generation and
[subsequent generations].”  Don testified that since Gordon distributed the
assets held by the trusts, he wanted to make sure they were protected so that
“these shares can only be owned by his issue or his children’s issue, basically
the blood line.  It can’t be owned by the spouse of anybody else, it’s his
issue.”  Don explained that the underlying concept of the 1993 Agreement was
control, consistent with the structure of CCL that Gordon adopted in 1977 on
the advice of his advisors.
[48]          
On May 4, 1994, Barb’s 90 common shares of 702
were reclassified as 90 Class B common shares. Don’s and Sherry’s shares were
similarly reclassified to distinguish them amongst the siblings.
[49]          
On January 20, 2000, 702 was amalgamated with another
company and became Samson Holdings Ltd. (“SHL”).  SHL is now the holding
company that holds shares in CCL, either directly or indirectly through ten sub-corporations. 
The value of SHL shares is directly related to the value of CCL shares.  In my
reasons, unless otherwise indicated, I refer to 702 shares as SHL shares.
[50]          
The Directors of SHL are Stuart, Barb, Don, and
Arnold Englander.
[51]          
Samson Investments Ltd. (“SIL”) is a related subsidiary
corporation of SHL that also holds CCL shares.  Don and Stuart are the sole
directors of SIL. A control corporation holds 800 special voting control shares
of SIL, which is wholly owned by Don and Stuart.
[52]          
At various junctures, when Barb or Stuart (or
through their holding companies) redeemed some of their SHL shares, they were
purchased by SIL.
[53]          
According to Don’s evidence, Gordon created a
new corporation in 1998: 1281228 Ontario Inc., (the “Control Corp.”) which
exercised voting control of 702 (and later SHL and SIL) and CCL.
[54]          
The Control Corp. was wholly owned by Gordon,
Stuart, and Don.  Don explained that its purpose was to have voting control
over 702, and later SHL and SIL.  While there was a gap in the documentary
evidence regarding how 1281228 Ontario Inc. took over control from 532 (which
was owned solely by Gordon), the fact that the new Control Corp. was created or
that it exercised voting control of SHL was not disputed.
[55]          
When Gordon died in 2001, Don and Stuart each
became 50% owners of the Control Corp. and had voting control over SHL and SIL.
[56]          
In 1999, Sherry’s 90 common shares were bought
out for $23.5M, for which funds were paid to her over several years.
[57]          
Don’s evidence was that Sherry felt that she was
wealthy and wanted more cash through dividend payments. Don testified that the
company was younger and there were not big dividends at that time.  He also
testified that Sherry’s involvement in the family business and as a director of
SHL had become disruptive.  For this reason, he said he would have paid a
premium to remove her.
[58]          
Don suggested to Sherry that she sell her
shares.  Don testified that after obtaining a valuation of shares, the parties
settled on the purchase price, and an agreement was reached whereby SHL bought
back her shares and they were cancelled.  The buyout was financed internally
without the sale of CCL shares.
[59]          
The Lang Family’s business grew significantly in
value. To appreciate the value of the SHL shares at the date of separation, I
provide a summary of CCL’s significant growth as explained by Don.
[60]          
In 1982, after graduating from business school,
Don joined Gordon’s business. He started at entry level positions within CCL and
became Vice-President of Operations when he was in his mid-30s.  He assumed
responsibility for all of CCL’s aerosol plants in North America and later CCL’s
contract manufacturing worldwide.
[61]          
In 2000, Don became the Chief Operating Officer of
CCL.  He testified that CCL underwent significant changes and massive growth. 
Today, CCL’s major business is manufacturing labels.  This includes clothing
labels, adhesive and plastic product labels seen on common grocery store or
pharmacy products, and labels used in car manufacturing and other technology parts
(i.e., iPhones).  Don’s evidence was that CCL is the second largest
manufacturer of clothing labels worldwide.
[62]          
CCL also prints money, literally.  As part of
its security business, CCL incorporates anti-counterfeiting measures into its
plastic resin production of currency for 35 countries, including Canada,
Australia, and the U.K.
[63]          
CCL has 200 factories globally, operates in 45
countries, and has 23,000 employees.
[64]          
CCL eventually became publicly traded.  In August
2001, its share price was $2.44.  By July 31, 2019, on the date of separation, its
share price was $66.00.  At the time of trial, CCL was valued at more than $2.2 billion.
[65]          
Between 1993 and 2000, after his initial health
scare, Gordon underwent treatments for various forms of cancer.  In 2001,
Gordon’s cancer came back.  According to Don and Barb’s testimony, Gordon was
the instigator of all of the estate planning, including Don’s estate freeze of
his 90 Class A common shares of SHL in December 2000, and Barb’s estate freeze of
her 90 Class B common shares about nine months later in August and September of
2001.
[66]          
Ian raised a hearsay objection in response to Don
and Barb’s evidence about their communications with Gordon regarding Barb’s
2001 estate freeze.  For reasons given below, I accept Don and Barb’s evidence
of Gordon’s intention with respect to Barb’s estate freeze under the principled
exception to the rule against hearsay.
[67]          
Barb’s estate freeze was completed through the
following transactions:
[68]          
The image below, presented at trial through one
of Barb’s witnesses, provides a timeline of key events described above.
[69]          
As a result of the estate freeze of Barb’s 90 shares
in SHL, the following may be said:
[70]          
On the date of separation, Control Corp. owned
1,982 special shares of SHL with voting control.  Since Don and Stuart had voting
control of SHL through the Control Corp., any sale of SHL shares required their
approval.  Similarly, Don and Stuart controlled whether dividends from SHL are
paid to 4MK (and other shareholders), and the amount of dividends.
[71]          
The parties’ experts agree that although 4MK
held approximately one-third of the common shares of SHL, 4MK (with Barb as its
sole director) held less than 4% of the voting shares of SHL.
[72]          
The diagram below was presented at trial by
Barb’s valuation expert, Ms. White, and provides a visual description of the
ownership of the NFT and various corporate entities as at the date of
separation.
[73]          
Shortly after marriage on August 21, 1987, Barb
and Ian began having children.  Their four children were born between 1988 and
1992.  At the time of the estate freeze in 2001, the children were between 9
and 13 years old.  On the date of separation, they were between 27 and 31.
[74]          
Barb worked as a teacher from 1981 to 1988.   She
did not return to work. Her evidence was that during the marriage, she was
primarily involved in managing the children and it was Ian’s responsibility to
manage the parties’ finances and their properties.
[75]          
Barb’s work-related roles was limited to attending
SHL Board meetings.  She testified that she would often discuss issues with Ian
after those meetings.  The evidence was clear that Barb had a very limited
understanding of financial and business issues.  Professional advisors retained
by the Lang family, including Mr. Howard Lerner and later, Mr. Andrew Butler, were
involved in explaining issues to Barb and Ian.
[76]          
Ian worked from 1986 until September 2012 in
real estate or property management.  He had various roles, working primarily
for Wittington Investments Ltd, and other companies owned or associated with
the Weston family.  He worked part-time after 2012 for a few years.  He stopped
working in 2017.  Ian has held a real estate licence and testified that he continues
to hold one, but he is not active in the real estate market and is not
currently working.  He does not hold a university degree.
[77]          
In 2010, Ian incorporated Castle Harbour Limited
(“Castle Harbour”).  He testified that Castle Harbour was set up as a shell
corporation to use for his own projects that he wanted to pursue, but none of
them had got off the ground.
[78]          
The evidence discloses that the family lived
well.   The children attended private schools and they were supported by a full-time
nanny.  They had a home in Toronto on Valleyanna Drive (“Valleyanna”) that they
purchased and renovated in or around 2008, and which sold in 2022 for $8.8M.  They
had other properties in Florida, Muskoka, and Ellicottville.  Significant funds
were spent on horses and their maintenance for Wesley, who is an equestrian.
[79]          
There was some dispute as to the extent to which
Ian was involved in the lives of the children.  However, Barb acknowledged that
Ian played a role in caring for the children when he was not working and when they
were young, that he had a good relationship with them at least until they were
teenagers, and that Ian cared for the three other children when Barb was away
with Wesley at horse shows in Florida.  Ian was also a board member of The Country
Day School where three of the parties’ children attended.  There was evidence
of the family vacationing at their cottage and annual vacations to Cabos San
Lucas.
[80]          
During the marriage, Ian was diagnosed with
several serious health conditions, including Lupus, Factor V Leiden (a blood
clotting disorder), and Polymyalgia rheumatica, which causes arthritic
symptoms.  Ian also suffered from alcoholism during the marriage.  In 2018, he
was admitted to an alcohol rehabilitation program.
[81]          
At trial, Ian testified that he suffered from
further conditions, including a hernia in his chest over his heart that impacts
his breathing.  There were periods when the trial was adjourned because of
Ian’s physical health.
[82]          
At the start of trial, the date of separation
was disputed.  Ian took the position it was August 27, 2018, and not July 31,
2019.  There was much evidence on this issue.  The evidence related to a fight the
parties had on August 27, 2018, Ian’s alcoholism, his admission to rehab in
October 2018, his mental health, and the related impacts on Barb and the
children.  On January 26, 2024, well into Ian’s presentation of his side of the
case, he withdrew his position on the date of separation.
[83]          
The parties no longer dispute the date of
separation. I find that the parties separated on July 31, 2019.
[84]          
In terms of the parties’ finances, Barb
acknowledged that Ian’s income was used to support the family and to pay
household bills.  Barb also received dividends on her shares which supported
the family.
[85]          
When Ian stopped working full-time in 2012, Barb
gave evidence that Ian drew on investments he had with Nesbitt Burns and she
began to share some of her dividends with Ian to cover expenses in 2017.
[86]          
Barb received income from various sources between
2001 and the date of separation.  From 2001 to 2012, her annual income ranged
from $150,000 to $650,000, except in 2008 and 2009. In those years, Barb
redeemed some of her preferred shares in 4MK and her income increased
significantly (an additional $5M and $3M, respectively).  From 2013 to 2019,
her annual income was higher, significantly so in some years.
[87]          
Barb’s income came from four sources:
[88]          
During the marriage, with the approval of Don
and Stuart, 12 SHL shares held by 4MK were bought back by SIL on the following
dates:
[89]          
4MK’s most significant asset was its ownership
of the 90 Class B common shares of SHL.  Because 12 had already been redeemed, 4MK
held 78 Class B Common shares on the date of separation.
[90]          
In addition, on the date of separation, 4MK held
limited cash and various investments.  These were investments Barb acquired during
the marriage from distributions she received from the NFT.  In 2018, she transferred
these investments to 4MK, and in exchange, she received a note receivable
valued at $8.7M on separation.
[91]          
On July 31, 2019, Barb’s trust assets consisted
of the following:
[92]          
The NFT was re-organized in 2022 after this
litigation started.  The 2022 re-organization saw the bulk of the NFT’s assets
being distributed among Barb and the parties’ four children and a new trust was
created (“2022 Trust”).  A greater distribution was made to each of the
children as compared to Barb.
[93]          
While there is no dispute that there would have
been significant tax implications due to the 21-year rule if the NFT’s assets
were not distributed, Ian submits that the distribution and the greater share
given to the children was informed by this litigation.   The re-organization is
described later in my Reasons.
[94]          
On March 29, 2022, O’Brien J. signed an Order (“O’Brien
Order”) reflecting a consent settlement of certain property issues.  Referred
to as a “property swap” at trial, the O’Brien Order achieved the following:
[95]          
The Florida condo was not resolved in the
“property swap.”  This condo was sold in October 2019 for $295,000 USD (or
$380,500 CDN converted at 1.29%). Ian takes the position that the proceeds of
sale to this condo should be included in Barb’s NFP and equalized.
[96]          
On October 19, 2023, Black J. heard a motion
brought by the parties’ children to be added as parties.   This was
approximately six weeks before the commencement of trial.  Black J. dismissed
the motion.
[97]          
Later in my Reasons, I reference this decision
and a ruling I made dismissing Barb’s motion, brought at the start of trial, to
bifurcate this trial.
[98]          
The issues and sub-issues to be decided are
several.  They are:
[99]          
The credibility and reliability of witness
testimony is relevant to several issues.  Barb and Don’s credibility is
relevant to this Court’s characterization of whether Barb’s interest in the NFT
was a gift.  Ian and Barb’s credibility is relevant to Ian’s claim for an
interest in a cottage property, Barb’s post-separation adjustments, other
disputed equalization items, and Ian’s claim for spousal support.
[100]      
Assessing credibility requires the court to
consider many factors.  Trial judges face the challenge of precisely articulating
the complex intermingling impressions after watching and listening to witnesses
when reconciling various versions of events: R v. Gagnon, 2006 SCC 17,
[2006] 1 S.C.R. 621, at para. 20.  A judge may accept some, none or all of a
witness’ evidence: R v. D.R., 1996 CanLII 207 (SCC), [1996] 2 SCR 291 at para. 93.
[101]      
Chappel J., in McBennett v. Danis, 2021
ONSC 3610, at para. 41 lists various factors to consider when assessing
credibility.  They include inconsistencies between a witness’ evidence and
other credible witnesses or documentary evidence; whether the witness’ evidence
is inherently improbable or implausible; the existence of other independent
evidence that confirms or contradicts a witness’ testimony; whether a witness
was straightforward or “evasive, strategic, hesitant or biased” and whether a
witness is able to make concessions or gives self-serving evidence.
[102]      
I assess the credibility of the key fact
witnesses, namely, Barb, Don, and Ian.
[103]      
The Court received evidence from other fact
witnesses, although the facts on which they led evidence were less
controversial.  I discuss their evidence in my reasons.
[104]      
The Court also received significant opinion
evidence from numerous experts, including valuation experts (Ms. Paula White for
Barb, and Mr. Steve Ranot for Ian), property appraisal experts (Mr. Brent
Ferguson for Barb, and Mr. Samuel Linds for Ian), and trust experts (Mr. Paul
Gibney for Barb, and Mr. Bruce Harris for Ian).  I consider their evidence and
provide reasons, where applicable, as to why I favoured one expert’s opinion
over another.
[105]       Barb was a careful witness.  She took time to consider questions put
to her to provide answers.  She had difficulty recalling dates.  She would
regularly consider the years in which her children were born to assist her in
recalling dates.  I considered whether, at times, her hesitation to answer
questions was because she did not want to give answers that would hurt her
case.  However, I do not make this finding.  Rather, I find that her hesitation
reflected her desire to be truthful and accurate, and was a product of her
limited business and financial knowledge.  After concluding her evidence in
chief, she raised with the Court deputy that she wanted to correct an answer
she had previously given, after having spent the evening trying to remember a
particular fact. This opportunity was granted.  Generally, I am satisfied Barb intended
to provide credible and reliable evidence.
[106]      
Ian argued that Barb was evasive in answering
questions that do not support her position.  However, from her testimony, it
was evident that she had little business, estates, tax or financial expertise. 
During the parties’ marriage, Barb was a teacher for a very brief period, but
then primarily a homemaker.  She was financially supported by her father’s
wealth and by Ian, who paid the household bills while he worked.  Barb would
discuss her financial affairs with Ian and relied on him to manage the family’s
finances. She was the director of 4MK, a director of SHL, and a trustee of the
NFT.  Despite these roles, I am satisfied that she had a limited understanding
of the management or operations of SHL or CCL, the various assets that she
held, the intricacies of the estate freeze, how the NFT was managed, or her
family’s finances.
[107]      
For example, Barb gave evidence about her
surprise when she learned that 12 of the 90 Class B common shares of SHL held
by 4MK had been sold.  She also recounted that after she started attending SHL
Board meetings in or around 1992, she would come home with a book of material
to have Ian explain it to her, so that she could understand what was happening. 
She testified that Ian knew everything that was going on in her bank accounts
and investments.  I found her evidence on these issues honest.
[108]      
I am satisfied that she was given “big picture”
information about her financial situation from Ian and her advisors, and she acted
on their advice.  Those who gave her advice were her father, Don, Ian, Howard
Lerner, and Andrew Butler (the latter two served as accountants and bookkeepers
for the family), along with professional tax, estates, and finance advisors.
[109]      
At times on cross-examination, it did appear
that Barb’s answers may have been scripted.  For example, she would repeatedly
refer to the transaction that resulted in the estate freeze as being a “sale”
of her shares, rather than as her own estate freeze involving her own assets.  I
was alive to her having a motive to fabricate evidence to minimize an
equalization payment to Ian.
[110]      
However, upon review of all the evidence, it is
clear that Barb had a limited understanding of the family’s finances and the transactions
that resulted in the estate freeze.  Her answers demonstrated that she had very
limited knowledge and understanding of the complex financial arrangements
involving her assets, rather than an intention to deceive the court.  For
example, she did not appreciate what a shareholder register was.  At one point,
she said she was a trustee of 4MK.  I do not find that she answered questions with
an intention to deceive or to provide scripted answers from others.  I am
persuaded she was trying her best to answer questions that were difficult for
her to understand, or for which she did not know the answer.
[111]      
I sought to reconcile how Barb could have been
surprised to learn that 12 of the 90 SHL shares held by 4MK had been sold,
since she was the sole director of 4MK.  This might be explained by the fact
that Ian principally managed the family finances, and that he often approached
Don for greater liquidity. In response, Don would speak with Barb and rather
than increase SHL dividends, Don would advise that Barb had to sell some of her
shares. It may be that Barb understood that when she received the proceeds from
the sale of the 12 shares, she was selling some of her 900 preferred shares in
4MK.  In fact, Mr. Lerner prepared memos to Barb to assist her in understanding
her assets in 4MK and the effect of redeeming her preferred shares.  Due to Barb’s
very limited understanding of financial issues, it would not be improbable that
Barb understood she was redeeming her preferred shares when the 12 SHL shares
were redeemed.
[112]      
I am satisfied Barb gave reliable evidence in
relation to discussions she had with her father about the shares he had given to
her, what Gordon wanted done with them, and his wish that they pass on to subsequent
generations through the NFT.   Barb’s evidence on this was consistent with
Don’s evidence.  It was consistent with documentary evidence, such as the 1993
Agreement.  It was also consistent with how Don dealt with his shares nine
months earlier in the estate freeze involving his shares.  While Barb did not
understand the intricacies of the estate freeze transaction, I am satisfied
that she understood her father’s wishes and recalled the steps she took to fulfil
them.
[113]      
Ian took issue with the shifting positions Barb took
in her sworn Financial Statements with respect to the NFT.  In a previous Financial
Statement, sworn October 25, 2019, she did not expressly exclude the value of
the NFT, although she did indicate excluded property was “TBD”.  In her November
2020 Financial Statement and any thereafter, she excluded the NFT.  In October
and November 2023, her Financial Statements reflected for the first time that
the NFT was not property, and that if it was property, her interest in the NFT was
only 20%, and that a 50% minority/illiquidity discount should be applied.  She
applied a similar minority/illiquidity discount to her interest in the BJL
Trust on the date of marriage.
[114]      
Ian argued that when Barb was questioned before
trial, she stated that her interest in the NFT was property.  I do not find
that her answers at questioning, while inconsistent with the position she took at
trial, speaks to her credibility.  The determination of whether the NFT is property
is a legal issue.  Furthermore, it is open to a litigant to take a position leading
up to trial that is different than the one at trial.  For this reason, it is
not uncommon for pleadings to be amended prior to trial, or in some instances
at trial – provided there is no prejudice that cannot be compensated in costs.
[115]       Ian experienced health issues throughout the trial.  It appeared he
was experiencing physical discomfort during parts of his evidence.  I viewed
his testimony with that in mind. He gave evidence of his medical conditions.  He
was forthright in acknowledging his alcoholism and the impact it had on the
family.  He was candid and grieved the lack of relationship he has with his
children.
[116]      
He was candid in giving evidence about the date
of separation.  His testimony strongly suggested that Barb would prevail on
this issue.  In my view, he properly conceded to Barb’s date of separation
mid-trial.
[117]      
Like Barb, Ian’s testimony lasted several days.  However,
unlike Barb, Ian tended to answer questions promptly.  He was less careful,
more casual, sometimes argumentative, and it was clear some of his evidence was
false, and possibly intentionally false.
[118]      
There were inconsistencies in his evidence.  In
his examination in chief, he gave evidence of not receiving an accounting of
expenses and income on the Lower Cottage that was rented.  On
cross-examination, he acknowledged having received them, although he said they
were incomplete.  He stated, in chief, that he was denied access to certain belongings
of his in the Lower Cottage, but in cross-examination, he acknowledged
receiving some items.
[119]      
In a previous affidavit, he attacked Barb for
certain conduct but the evidence at trial was that it was Ian who engaged in
the problematic behaviour.  For example, he alleged Barb had installed spyware
on his computer.  At trial, this was not proven.  Instead, it was Ian who admitted
to having accessed Barb’s email account to gather emails for this litigation.   He
sent an email to a third party confirming he had done so.  In prior affidavits
and evidence in chief, he criticized Barb for her spending on horses for their
daughter, Wesley; however, at trial, Ian’s evidence was that he negotiated the
purchase price of the horses.  He was later emphatic in stating he wanted to keep
the horses out of this litigation.
[120]      
There was evidence of Ian forging Barb’s
signature on various documents.  His initial position was that he did sign
Barb’s signature on some documents, but only with her consent.  In his
examination in chief, he testified that Barb signed BMO documents in April
2015.  These documents included a Trading Authorization Form that permitted Ian
to trade investments on Barb’s behalf.  He provided a detailed description of a
meeting with his brother, a financial advisor, at BMO offices where his
brother’s associate, Ms. Nichols was present.  Ian stated Barb was with him
that day, that Ms. Nichols at BMO witnessed Barb’s signature, and the
signatures were made on a “low table” – perhaps to explain the irregular
signatures.    Barb’s evidence was that she was not certain this signature was
hers.
[121]      
On cross-examination, Ian continued to assert
that the signature on the BMO forms was Barb’s and not his.  He maintained this
position even after he was told that Barb was in Florida on the day she
purportedly attended BMO’s office to sign these documents, and he went further
to suggest that Barb could have signed the documents while in Florida.   Later
in the trial, on consent and to avoid reply evidence from Ian’s brother and Ms.
Nichols, Ian agreed to a written stipulation of his evidence, which states:
“Mr. Newlands acknowledges that Ms. Lang was in Florida in April, 2015.  He
does not specifically remember signing Ms. Lang’s name on the BMO from in
April, 2015, however, he will acknowledge for the purposes of the litigation
that he did so.”
[122]      
I am satisfied that Ian intentionally gave false
evidence with respect to Barb signing the BMO forms in April 2015, which was
only corrected after it was presented to him that Barb was in Florida and could
not have attended BMO’s offices.  He also admitted to forging Barb’s signature
on other documents, specifically a lease to the Lower Cottage, and a municipal
form in relation to the cottage properties, after suggesting that these
signatures were Barb’s or may have been Barb’s.  Not only did he forge her
signature, he also admitted to directing his former assistant to witness Barb’s
forged signature.
[123]      
The uncontradicted evidence from Howard Lerner, who
performed accounting, bookkeeping and tax preparation work for the family, was
that Ian had a primary role in managing the family’s finances.   Mr. Lerner would
rarely meet with Barb.   Ian gave evidence that he had discussions with Barb
about family purchases and their finances, and then he would liaise with Don, Howard
Lerner, or others.  I am satisfied that Ian had a greater understanding of
Barb’s financial situation than Barb.  Notwithstanding this greater understanding
of the family finances, Ian was often unable to remember or account for
significant spending that occurred during the marriage.
[124]      
Given the passage of time for some of the events,
I would be inclined to accept discrepancies in Ian’s recollection of facts. 
However, I am persuaded that Ian had motive to deceive the court on material
pieces of evidence and that he attempted to do so on some occasions.
[125]      
For these reasons, generally, and to the extent there
is inconsistency between Barb and Ian’s evidence on material facts that cannot be
reconciled by other documentary or witness testimony, I prefer Barb’s evidence
over Ian’s evidence.
[126]       Don is an experienced and professional businessman.  His testimony
demonstrated intimate knowledge of CCL and SHL, consistent with his increasingly
senior roles in them since 1982.  Don is the Executive Chairman of CCL, having
formerly served as its CEO as of 2001.  He is a director of SHL, and owns 50%
of the voting shares of the Control Corp. with Stuart.
[127]      
Don is also a trustee of the NFT, along with
Barb and Stuart.  He is also Barb’s brother and Gordon’s son.  He gave evidence
of the close and loving relationship he had with his father.
[128]      
In these various roles, Don has legal
responsibilities as a corporate director, fiduciary duties to shareholders to
effectively manage CCL and SHL, fiduciary duties as a trustee of the NFT to
Barb and her children, and moral responsibilities to support his sister and to
carry out Gordon’s intentions with respect to the family business.  Given these
various roles, I was mindful that he may have motive to minimize an
equalization payment to Ian.
[129]      
However, subject to some minor errors in his
evidence which he corrected, I do not find Don gave false or misleading
evidence.  His answers were direct and frank.  His demeanour, and the
consistency of his testimony with Barb’s testimony and documentary evidence suggest
he was credible and that his answers were reliable.  Furthermore, Don worked
closely with Gordon in Gordon’s business.   He recounted Gordon’s intentions with
respect to the estate planning that was probable, logical, and consistent with the
documentary evidence.  Furthermore, Don testified that he was there when Gordon
and his advisors were telling them to engage in the estate freezes, consistent
with the long-term plan of the 1993 Agreement.
[130]      
Ian argued that Don’s evidence was unreliable
and appeared scripted.  He argued that Don refused to concede that Barb froze her
SHL shares and that it was Barb’s estate freeze.  Instead, like Barb, Don
continued to state that Barb “sold” her shares.  These answers do not suggest
that the answers were scripted, and therefore, unreliable.  Rather, they speak
to how Don (and Barb) understood the transactions and how they characterized
them.  These answers were consistent with Barb and Don’s understanding that
when the NFT was created, there were transactions – Barb sold her SHL shares in
exchange for preferred shares of 4MK (valued at $24.5M), with the future growth
being owned by the NFT, with Barb being one of the discretionary
beneficiaries.
[131]      
On cross-examination, Don answered various
questions which Ian suggested speak to his desire to assist his sister.  For
example,
[132]      
There were other attacks on Don’s credibility
that relate to his knowledge or lack thereof of the 2022 re-organization of the
NFT trust, even though he was a trustee in the 2022 Trust.  This is not
surprising since Don consistently testified that he relied on professional
advisors in setting up the trust.
[133]      
In sum, I am satisfied that Don gave credible and
reliable evidence.
[134]       Barb’s other witnesses in this case were:
[135]      
Ian’s other witnesses in this case were:
[136]      
Where necessary in my reasons, I discuss the
credibility and reliability of these witnesses.
[137]      
The BJL Trust held 90 common shares in 702 on
August 21, 1987, the date of marriage.
[138]      
Barb’s expert valuator, Ms. White, assigned a
value to these shares of $16,010,752 in her expert report dated August 30, 2023,
subject to contingent taxes and a minority/liquidity discount.
[139]      
Ian’s expert valuator, Mr. Ranot, prepared four
reports valuing Barb’s assets on the date of marriage based on different
scenarios.  The first assumed a 50% taxable capital gains inclusion rate. The
second assumed a 75% taxable capital gains inclusion rate.  His third report
assumed a 50% taxable capital gains inclusion rate, plus a 5% discount for
absence of control. His fourth report assumed a 75% taxable capital gains inclusion
rate, plus a 5% discount for absence of control.
[140]      
Both experts used an adjusted book value
approach to valuing this asset.  Both testified that they reached similar
conclusions on the gross valuation of the 90 common shares in 702, before taxes. 
In Mr. Ranot’s first report, he valued the 90 common shares at $15,960,000. Ms.
White valued them at $16,010,752.
[141]      
The experts differed in their ultimate valuation
based on (a) what capital gains inclusion rate is to be applied; (b) whether a
minority/liquidity discount is to be applied; and (c) whether a mortality risk
discount is applicable.[6]
Mr. Ranot considered a mortality risk discount, while Ms. White did not.
[142]      
After applying a 50% capital gains inclusion
rate and a 50% minority discount, Ms. White concluded the value of Barb’s
interest in the BJL Trust on the date of marriage was $8,005,000, less contingent
taxes of $870,000, resulting in a net value of $7,135,000.  This is the
position Barb took at trial.
[143]      
In his NFP Statement, Ian’s position was that
the value of Barb’s interest was $12,880,000.  This is based on Mr. Ranot’s
second report that uses a 75% capital gains inclusion rate, and no discount for
absence of control.
[144]      
Ms. White used a 50% capital gains inclusion
rate because this was the rate applicable at the date of marriage.
[145]      
Mr. Ranot did not opine on the correct taxable
capital gains inclusion rate.  He did not dispute that the 50% capital gains
inclusion rate was in place on the date of marriage.  However, he explained
that on June 18, 1987, two months before the parties married, the Department of
Finance released its Tax Reform White Paper announcing comprehensive
changes to the tax system, including increasing the capital gains inclusion
rate from its then 50% rate to 66 2/3% in 1988 and 1989, and to 75% commencing
in 1990.  He testified that from his experience working in the KPMG tax
department, taxpayers generally act on assumptions that rates would increase.
[146]      
Ms. White acknowledged this announcement was
made.  Though she pointed out that the announcement was not made into law until
the federal budget was passed in 1988.  On the date of marriage, the capital
gains inclusion rate was 50%, and it is only with hindsight that we know it changed
to 66.33% for 1988 and 75% for 1990.  Ms. White also stated in her report that with
hindsight, we know the federal government reverted to a 66 2/3% inclusion rate on
February 27, 2000, and a 50% inclusion rate from October 18, 2000, onwards.
[147]      
I find that the proper capital gains inclusion
rate to apply when calculating Barb’s interest in the BJL Trust is 50%.  I make
this finding because the policy intent underlying the FLA and the
express language in s. 4(1) of the FLA contemplates a “snapshot”
valuation to be undertaken of a spouse’s assets “on the date of marriage” and “date
of separation”: see, DeFaveri v. Toronto Dominion Bank, 1999 CanLII 4162
(ON CA), 45 R.F.L. (4th) 141, at para. 4; Numair v. Numair,
2022 ONSC 3449, at para. 103.  To apply a future capital gains inclusion rate
not yet legislated when valuing an asset on the date of marriage, would be
inconsistent with the language and scheme of the FLA.
[148]      
Other cases have ruled similarly.  In Fox v.
Fox, 2006 CanLII 63731, 26 R.F.L. (6th) 64 (Ont. S.C.), at para. 56,
Karakatsanis J. (as she then was), held that it was not appropriate to discount
the value of a date of marriage asset to account for a risk that a party would
misappropriate that asset in the future.  In Halliwell v. Halliwell,
2016 ONSC 182, at para. 57, Harper J., when assessing whether potential
litigation at the time of separation would impact the value of an asset for
equalization purposes stated, “[i]t is not proper to use hindsight in order to
determine value.”[7]
[149]      
Finally, while a tax advisor may give advice to
taxpayers based on announcements of anticipated tax hikes, to interweave these and
other contingencies into the “snapshot” equalization analysis required under s.
4 of the FLA would lead to uncertainty and impracticalities in our
family justice system.
[150]      
Accordingly, I find that the proper capital
gains inclusion rate to apply to Barb’s interest in the BJL Trust is 50%.
[151]      
The issue of minority/illiquidity discounts
consumed significant trial time, primarily during Ms. White’s and Mr. Ranot’s
testimony.
[152]      
Ms. White opined that a 50% minority/illiquidity
discount should apply to Barb’s date of separation interest in the NFT,
principally because of Barb’s lack of control.  She also opined that a 50% minority/illiquidity
discount should also apply to Barb’s interest in the BJL Trust on the date of
marriage, for similar reasons.
[153]      
Mr. Ranot did not agree.  In his view, Barb
exercised control of the shares in the NFT in concert with her brothers.  He
did not view a minority/illiquidity discount to Barb’s interest in the NFT or the
BJL Trust was appropriate, although he did calculate a minority/illiquidity
discount of 5% if the Court were to find one applicable.
[154]      
Barb’s position was that a 50% discount is
applicable to her interest in the NFT.  She submitted that this discount should
also apply to her interest in the BJL trust because there was a similar lack of
control, as well as for the sake of consistency.
[155]      
Later, I fully assess minority, illiquidity and
blockage discounts when valuing the NFT.  There, I explain why I conclude that
a minority/illiquidity discount of 50% should apply to Barb’s interest in the
NFT on the date of separation.  However, I provide a brief explanation here as to
why I apply a 50% minority/illiquidity discount to the BJL Trust on the date of
marriage.
[156]      
Slightly different facts are at play when assessing
lack of control and illiquidity in relation to the BJL Trust, in comparison to
the NFT.  Barb was a discretionary beneficiary of both trusts; however, unlike
the NFT, Barb’s interest in the BJL Trust was more certain.  She would certainly
acquire the assets of the BJL Trust at age 39, provided she was still alive,
and provided the trustees did not previously dispose of the shares or its other
assets.  In addition, the 1993 Agreement, which restricted shares ownership to
Lang family members did not exist.  Had the shares been distributed to Barb
before the 1993 Agreement, this restriction on share disposition would not have
been a restriction.
[157]      
On the other hand, there were other control and
liquidity factors present with respect to the BJL Trust.  Gordon controlled the
BJL Trust as co-trustee.  The trustees controlled what flowed into the BJL
Trust and they also controlled distributions to Barb.  By the date of marriage,
Gordon and his co-trustees could have sold the trust’s assets, as they saw fit.
   There was no evidence of a shareholder agreement that would permit Barb to
liquidate her shares if those shares were distributed to her.  The BJL Trust’s
assets were shares in 702, and Gordon exercised voting control over 702.  By at
least 1986 and likely sooner, there was a control corporation in place that
could have restricted the sale.
[158]      
Ms. White explained that because of the control Gordon
exercised, she applied a 50% discount.  She further explained that a consistent
discount approach – applied on the date of marriage and date of separation – in
a case with similar facts was accepted by the Court in LeVan v. LeVan 2006
CanLII 31020, 82 O.R. (3d) 1.  This was another reason why Ms. White applied the
same discount rate.
[159]      
While I considered a slightly reduced
minority/illiquidity discount when valuing the BJL Trust because of the
different facts at play on the date of marriage and date of separation, a
discount rate of 50% benefits Ian.  It would reduce Barb’s date of marriage
deduction.  It was Barb’s position that a 50% minority discount should apply. 
For this reason, I apply a 50% minority/illiquidity discount to the BJL Trust.
[160]      
Ms. White and Mr. Ranot placed similar values on
the BJL Trust on the date of marriage.  ($16,010,752, and $15,960,000,
respectively).  These values are marginally different.  Because I accept Ms.
White’s minority/illiquidity discount valuations, I prefer her valuation of the
BJL Trust over Mr. Ranot’s.
[161]      
Applying a minority/liquidity discount of 50%
when valuing Barb’s interest in the BJL Trust, results in a value of $8,005,000.
[162]      
Ms. White determined the contingent taxes on
Barb’s interest in the BJL Trust to be $1,740,000.  She discounted contingent
taxes by 50%, consistent with the 50% minority/liquidity discount that she
applied, resulting in discounted contingent taxes of $870,000.
[163]      
I find the value of Barb’s interest in the BJL
Trust to be $8,005,000 after applying a 50% minority/illiquidity discount, less
contingent taxes of $870,000, resulting in a net value of $7,135,000.
[164]      
Mr. Ranot’s valuation of Barb’s interest in the
BJL Trust noted that Barb was married at age 30 and she was the sole
beneficiary of the BJL Trust, provided she attained the age of 39.   In his
first report (with a 50% capital gains inclusion rate and no discount), Mr. Ranot
applied a mortality risk discount after placing a value on the BJL Trust
($15,960,000) and deducting contingent taxes ($2,290,000). He reduced the value
further by a mortality risk because Barb had not yet reached the age of 39 when
she would certainly receive the trust asset.  Mr. Ranot calculated this risk
using the 1987 mortality table, and applied a discount of 0.553%, or $75,636.
[165]      
Ms. White did not address this issue.
[166]      
I find that a mortality risk discount of 0.553%
should be applied for the reasons that Mr. Ranot explained.
[167]      
The net value of the BJL Trust, after contingent
taxes, is $7,135,000.  I reduce this amount further by $39,456 (0.553% of
$7,135,000) to account for mortality risk.  This results in a net value of the
BJL Trust to be $7,095,500 (rounded).
[168]      
On the date of marriage, Barb was one of four
beneficiaries of the Gordon S. Lang Trust (“GSL Trust”).  The GSL Trust’s sole asset
was a promissory note receivable for $18,051,911.  This asset was distributed equally
during the marriage among Barb and her siblings (the other beneficiaries).
[169]      
Ms. White valued Barb’s 25% interest on the date
of marriage at $4,512,978.  Mr. Ranot valued it similarly, at $4,513,000.
[170]      
However, like the BJL Trust, Barb said a 50%
minority and illiquidity discount should be applied, reducing its value to
$2,256,000.  Ian said no discount should be applied.
[171]      
The rationale for applying a
minority/illiquidity discount to the GSL Trust is less apparent.  The GSL
Trust’s asset was a promissory note, a more liquid than the asset of shares
where issues around lack of control and illiquidity may be present.  Ms. White
explained, however, that because Barb did not control the GSL Trust, she
applied the same discount rate as she did to the BJL Trust.
[172]      
I would be inclined to assign a modest discount
to Barb’s value in the GSL Trust because she did not control the trust; but,
because its assets were not shares, I would not be inclined to assign a discount
as high as 50%.  However, because a discount to Barb’s interest in the GSL
Trust on the date of marriage benefits Ian, and because Barb’s position is that
a 50% discount to the GSL Trust should apply, I apply the 50% discount.
[173]      
I find the value of Barb’s interest in the GST
Trust on the date of marriage to be $2,256,000.
[174]      
Barb’s position was that her interest as a
beneficiary in the NFT was a discretionary trust interest, and therefore, not
“property” pursuant to s. 4(1) of the FLA.  She relied on family law
cases which have held discretionary trust interests are not property.
[175]      
Ian’s position was that Barb’s interest in the
NFT, even if it is a discretionary interest, is “property” under s. 4 of the FLA. 
He relied on the definition of property in s. 4(1)(a) of the FLA to
argue that Barb’s power as Trustee as set out in the NFT Trust Deed, in
conjunction with her brothers (who were also Trustees), means she had a power
of appointment exercisable in her favour.  As such, he stated that the statute
clearly includes the value of the NFT as property.
[176]      
Before turning to the legal principles and
analysis, it is necessary to define and contextualize Barb’s interest in the
NFT with reference to the Trust Deed.
[177]      
Gordon settled the NFT on August 22, 2001 for
$100, naming Barb, Don, and Stuart as Trustees.
[178]      
Para. 1(a) defined the beneficiaries as “Barbara
Joan Lang-Newlands, and all of her issue, whether now living or whether born or
adopted at any time after the date of this Settlement…”.
[179]      
Para. 1(c) defined “Distribution Date” to mean “the
earlier of (i) the date on which there is no child of Barbara Joan Lang-Newlands
alive and under the age of thirty-five years; and (ii) such earlier date as the
Trustees may in their unfettered discretion designate in writing.”
[180]      
Other relevant portions of the NFT Deed state:
[181]      
When the NFT was established on August 22, 2001,
the children were 13 (Wesley), 11 (Spencer), 10 (Harrison), and 8 (Jordan)
years old.
[182]      
On the date of separation (July 31, 2019), the
children were 31 (Wesley), 29 (Spencer), 28 (Harrison), and 26 (Jordan) years
old.
[183]       Section 4(1) of the FLA defines property.
[184]      
This definition of “property” is broad.  It includes
“any interest, present or future, vested or contingent, in real or personal
property”.
[185]      
In Black v. Black (1988), 1988 CanLII 4756 (ON SC), 66 O.R. (2d)
643 (H.C.), in holding that the husband’s beneficial interest in a trust at the
date of marriage was property under s. 4(1), Walsh J. stated that “[t]he
definition of “property” contained in s. 4 of the Act is all-encompassing.”  Property
can include a stream of income derived from a trust: Brinkos v. Brinkos,
1989 CanLII 4266 (ON CA), 69 O.R. (2d) 225.
[186]      
However, the definition of “property” is not
without its limits: Lowe v. Lowe (2006), 2006 CanLII 804 (ON CA), 78 O.R. (3d) 760 (C.A.), at
para. 12.
[187]      
In Lowe, the issue was whether a stream
of income from a WSIB disability benefit was “property” under s. 4(1).  The
Court held, at para. 15, that it was not property because it bore no
relationship to the marriage partnership, but rather arose because of a
disability that impeded the recipient’s capacity to earn a livelihood.  Citing
Misener J. in Pallister v. Pallister (1990), 1990 CanLII 12272 (ON SC), 29 R.F.L. (3d) 395 (Ont. S.C.),
at pp. 404-06, the Court held, at para 14:
[188]      
The NFT Deed makes it clear that Barb’s ability
to receive funds from the trust was at the unfettered discretion of the
Trustees.
[189]      
Barb argued that because she had a discretionary
interest in the NFT without certainty of any future distribution, the trust
asset is not “property” under s. 4(1) of the FLA.  Unlike the BJL Trust,
where Barb would certainly receive those trust assets upon a contingent event
occurring (i.e., Barb turning 39), Barb said her interest in the NFT was
uncertain and therefore no property interest existed on the valuation date. She
relied on several authorities.
[190]      
In Spencer v. Riesberry, 2012 ONCA 418,
114 O.R. (3d) 375, the Court of Appeal held, at para. 37, that, “[u]nless the
terms of the trust expressly provide otherwise, a beneficiary of a trust has no
property interest in any specific asset of the trust, prior to or absent an
appropriation of such asset to the beneficiary by the trustee”.
[191]      
Spencer does not assist
Barb.  In Spencer, the wife’s mother created a trust that held real
property, including the home in which the parties lived during the marriage.  The
trust agreement identified the mother as the trustee and the wife (and her
siblings) as beneficiaries.  The assets of the trust were only to be divided
amongst beneficiaries after the death of the mother.   The husband argued that
the home in which they lived was their matrimonial home under s. 18(1) of the FLA.
[192]      
The trial judge found that the wife had a
contingent beneficial interest in the trust, “whatever that might be on the
death of [the wife’s mother]”. The wife, however, had no interest in any
specific property held by the trust.  The trial judge therefore concluded that
the wife did not have an interest in property within the meaning of s. 18(1) of
the FLA: Spencer v. Riesberry, 2011 ONSC 3222, 17 R.F.L (7th) 73,
at para. 36 (“Spencer Trial Decision”).
[193]      
The trial judge went on to consider whether the
wife’s interest in the trust was to be included in her NFP.  He relied on definitions
in s. 4(1) of the FLA and case law in which courts have held that a
beneficial interest in a trust, whether vested or contingent, is property and is
to be included when determining a spouse’s NFP: Spencer Trial Decision, at
paras. 39-42, and 61.
[194]      
On appeal, the appellant husband only challenged
the trial judge’s first determination as to whether the wife’s interest in the
property was a matrimonial home within the meaning of s. 18(1) of the FLA:
Spencer, at para. 13.  The appellate court did not consider whether the
wife’s interest in the trust was “property” under s. 4(1) to be included within
her NFP.  It was in the context of a s. 18(1) analysis, not a s. 4(1) analysis,
that the Court of Appeal determined the wife had no interest in the property
held by the trust.
[195]      
The definition of property governing the
interpretation of s. 18(1) of the FLA, found in Part II which deals with
the matrimonial home, is significantly different than the definition of
property in s. 4(1) of the FLA, found in Part I of the Act.  The
definition of “property” in Part II of the FLA is found in s. 17.  It
defines property simply as “real or personal property.”  It is not as broad or
all-encompassing as the definition of “property” in s. 4(1) found in Part I of
the FLA, which includes “any interest, present or future, vested or
contingent…”.  Therefore, the Court of Appeal’s holding that a beneficiary has
no property interest in a specific asset of a trust prior to, or absent an
appropriation of such asset to the beneficiary, was specific to whether the
wife had “real or personal property”, and not whether her trust interest was “property”
as more broadly defined under Part I of the FLA.
[196]      
In a non-family case, S.A. v. Metro Vancouver
Housing Corp., 2019 SCC 4, [2019] 1 S.C.R. 99, the appellant, who had a
disability, was receiving rental assistance from the respondent.  The appellant
was required to provide annual income verification.  The appellant had a
discretionary interest in a Trust that was settled for her care, maintenance, education,
and benefit.  She was a co-trustee of the trust, along with her sister.  It was
a Henson trust.  The appellant could not compel the trustees to make
payments to her and she could not unilaterally collapse the Trust.  The
respondent sought disclosure of the Trust fund, which they viewed as an “asset”
and subject to disclosure in their Assistance Application.  The appellant
refused.
[197]      
At paras. 38-39, the Supreme Court found that
the appellant had an interest in the Trust subject to the discretion of the
Trustees, but that the terms of the Trust did not confer any fixed entitlements
on the appellant.  The terms of the trust contemplated the possibility that the
appellant might not receive all, or even any, of the trust property.  There
were no enforceable rights to receive anything, unless and until the Trustees
decided to exercise their discretion in her favour.  The appellant’s interest
in the Trust was “akin to a mere hope that some or all of its property
will be distributed to her at some point in the future.”  Nothing turned on the
fact the appellant was a co-trustee in determining the nature of her interest
in the Trust.  Because the Trust terms required there to always be two trustees
who made decisions unanimously, the appellant was prevented from unilaterally
ordering payments to herself.
[198]      
S.A. is
distinguishable.   S.A. was interpreting the word “asset” within the
Assistance Application, as a matter of contractual interpretation: S.A., at
para. 41.  The Supreme Court interpreted “asset” to mean “property or interest
in property that can actually be used to discharge his debts and liabilities”:
S.A., at para. 48.  In contrast, the definition of “property” in s. 4(1)
of the FLA is broader than the Supreme Court’s interpretation of “asset”
in S.A.
[199]      
There are several Ontario family cases where a
spouse’s discretionary interest in a trust was found to be property and
included in NFP calculations.
[200]      
In Sagl v. Sagl (1997), 1997 CanLII 12248 (ON SC), 31 R.F.L. (4th)
405 (Ont. S.C.), the husband was one of several beneficiaries of a Trust and
was also one of three trustees.  The husband had the power to appoint or remove
a trustee.  Trustees exercised absolute discretion.  Decisions had to be made
by a majority, provided that the husband was in the majority.  After
considering the definition of property in the FLA and trust law, the
Court held that the husband’s contingent interest in the discretionary trust was
property and subject to valuation: Sagl, at para. 37.
[201]      
In Kushnir v. Lowry, [2004] O.T.C. 133, the
wife was one of two beneficiaries of a discretionary trust that was created by
the wife’s mother: at paras. 21, 23.  While the Court did not undertake a
thorough analysis of the issue, it concluded that because the wife was one of
only two beneficiaries of the trust, 50% of the trust assets should be included
in her NFP.
[202]      
In LeVan, the Court considered the value
of the husband’s discretionary interest in the income and capital of a trust at
the date of marriage.  The husband, along with his siblings and their issue, were
beneficiaries.  The Court also did not analyze whether the husband’s
discretionary interest in the trust was property under the FLA, but it
did treat it as “property”.
[203]      
In Mudronja v. Mudronja, 2014 ONSC 6217,
the husband’s father created a trust during the marriage.  The husband was the
sole trustee.  The beneficiaries were the wife, the couple’s children, and the
family company (60% owned by the husband, 40% by the wife).  However, the
husband was given the power to appoint himself or anyone else as an additional
beneficiary.
[204]      
In Mudronja, at para. 96, Seppi J.
considered traditional trust law principles, similar to the Ontario Court of
Appeal’s decision in Spencer. Seppi J. stated that “[t]raditional trust law principles are clear that a person
who is named as the object of trustee discretion to pay income or capital in
his or her favour does not have an existing property interest.”[9]  From a
property law perspective, this interest is only an “expectancy”.  This stands
in contrast to a person who has a fixed, vested, or purely contingent interest.
[205]      
After considering some of the above noted cases,
Seppi J. concluded, at para 98:
[206]      
I agree with the approach and rationale of Seppi
J. in Mundronja.  I find that Barb’s interest in the NFT is property
within the meaning of s. 4(1) of the FLA for the purposes of NFP
calculations and not excluded simply because it is discretionary.  The real
issue in this case is determining the value of Barb’s discretionary interest in
the NFT.
[207]      
Ian also argued that Barb’s interest in the NFT
is “property” under s. 4(1)(a) of the FLA because the definition of
“property” includes “property over which a spouse has, alone or in conjunction
with another person, a power of appointment exercisable in favour of himself or
herself.”   Ian relied on para 2(a) of the Trust Settlement, which gives the
Trustees, of which Barb was one in conjunction with her brothers, the
uncontrolled discretion to make distributions to the beneficiaries, which
included Barb.
[208]      
As stated in Anger & Honsberger, Law of
Real Property, 3rd ed. (Toronto: Thomson Reuters, 2015) (loose-leaf updated
2023, release 1, 10/2023) at § 13:
[209]      
As a trustee, Barb had the power in conjunction
with her brothers, to distribute assets of the NFT to herself.  Because of this
power of appointment in favour of herself, the property meets the statutory definition
of property in s. 4(1)(a) of the FLA.
[210]      
While I agree with this legal conclusion, this
does not resolve the question of whether the entire value of the NFT is to be
included as Barb’s property.  I agree with Mr. Youdan, one of Ian’s counsel,
who argued during closing submissions that once a discretionary interest in a
trust is determined to be property, the determination of what value to ascribe
to that interest ought to depend on the control the trustee possessed to
distribute trust assets to themselves as beneficiary.
[211]      
For example, in Mudronja the husband, as
the sole trustee, had the power to appoint himself as beneficiary and, at his unlimited
discretion, had the power to distribute all trust assets to himself as a
beneficiary.  As a result, the Court assigned nominal value to the wife’s
beneficial interest in the trust, noting that at the date of separation, the
parties were adversaries: Mudronja, at para. 100.
[212]      
In Tremblay v. Tremblay, 2016 ONSC 588, Phillips
J.’s analysis as to whether a husband’s discretionary interest in a trust is “property”
within s. 4(1) of the FLA was determined based on whether the husband had
the ability to control distributions of trust property to himself:  para. 31.  In
other words, whether a trust asset was “property” depended on the ability of
the trustee to control distributions.
[213]      
My analysis differs from that in Tremblay. 
Based on the broad statutory language of s. 4(1) and caselaw cited earlier, I conclude
that Barb’s interest in the NFT, albeit a discretionary interest, is “property”
under s. 4(1) of the FLA. In this case, it is not necessary to assess control
to define such an interest as “property”.
[214]      
I agree, however, that the indicia of control
set out in in Tremblay, at para. 32, are helpful to assess what value
ought to ascribe to Barb’s discretionary interest.  In examining these indicia
of control, the Court can conduct a contextual analysis and assign a value to
the portion of trust assets that are elevated from an expectancy to a
certainty.  I return to this analysis when valuing Barb’s interest in the NFT.
[215]      
Barb relied on Kochar v. Kochar, 2015
ONSC 6650, 71 R.F.L. (7th) 183, a case that dealt with a motion for disclosure
in a family proceeding.  The wife sought disclosure with respect to a trust in
which the husband was a discretionary beneficiary.  At para. 20, Aston J. held:
[216]      
Kochar is
distinguishable.  Barb had a power of appointment in conjunction with her
brothers exercisable in her favour.  The husband in Kochar apparently
did not.
[217]      
Barb also relied on Durakovic v. Durakovic,
[2008] O.J. No. 3537 (Ont. S.C.).  In that case, the wife’s family had a trust
that had terms that were imprecisely defined.  The Trust indenture was not
produced at trial.  According to Mr. Paul Gibney, an expert who had seen the
indenture (and who was also a witness in the present case), the beneficiaries
were the wife’s mother and her siblings.  The identities of the trustees were
not disclosed.  The wife was “a mere residuary beneficiary” and there was
“considerable uncertainty as to whether the [wife]…would ever be entitled to
any further proceeds and/or certainly any corpus of the trust: Durakovic,
at para. 62.
[218]      
Durakovic is also
distinguishable for the same reason.  Barb was a trustee and a beneficiary of
the NFT.  In conjunction with her brothers, she had a power of appointment
exercisable in her favour.  In addition, in Durakovic, the wife’s potential
interest in any remaining balance in the trust was “at the behest of or after
the decease of the four named beneficiaries”: Durakovic, at para. 85.  The
wife’s entitlement was residual and contingent upon her mother being alive.  In
contrast, Barb’s interests pursuant to the NFT Deed was as a direct
beneficiary.
[219]      
And finally, Barb relied on Borges v. Santos,
2017 ONCJ 651, 100 R.F.L. (7th) 483, where the Court considered whether a
husband’s discretionary interest in a trust is “property” in the context of a
garnishment proceeding arising from a child support Order.   In that case, the
Court held that the husband’s discretionary interest in a trust was not
property subject to garnishment.  I do not decide whether property subject to
garnishment is the same as “property” under s. 4 of the FLA for NFP equalization
purposes; the definitions may not be the same.  However, I find Borges
distinguishable because the husband was not both a trustee and a beneficiary to
the trust, and there was no evidence he had a power of appointment exercisable
in his favour.
[220]      
In conclusion, Barb does not have a right to
receive an interest in the NFT.  As held in S.A., a discretionary
beneficiary only possesses a “mere hope” that the trustees will exercise their
discretion in a manner favourable to her.  Nothing in my reasons is intended to
challenge this authority.
[221]      
However, in this case, Barb is both a beneficiary
and trustee, with a power of appointment with her brothers to make a
distribution in her favour, and she has in fact received substantial
distributions from the NFT.  With these facts, it would be inconsistent with
the broad definition of “property” in s. 4(1) of the FLA to not include as
“property” Barb’s interest in the NFT.  I find it is “property” and its value
is to be determined after considering various factors, including the control
Barb exercised over the assets held by the NFT.
[222]      
The analysis of whether Barb is entitled to an
exclusion must be grounded in the statutory language in s. 4(2).  Specifically,
a spouse’s NFP is not to include “[p]roperty…that was acquired by gift…from a
third person after the date of marriage.”
[223]      
Barb argued that if her interest in the NFT is
property, it is excluded on the date of separation pursuant to s. 4(2)1 of the FLA
because it was a gift acquired from her father during the marriage.  Barb said
the gift is her beneficial interest in the NFT which Gordon created during the
marriage.
[224]      
Ian argued that, on the date of marriage in
1987, Barb held the common shares in SHL (then 702) indirectly through the BJL
Trust, in which she was the sole, contingent beneficiary.  At no point after
marriage were the SHL shares owned by Barb’s father, who purportedly “gifted”
Barb an interest in the NFT.
[225]      
Ian also argued that the same property cannot be
both a date of marriage deduction and an exclusion under s. 4(2).
[226]      
A case with surprisingly similar facts is Shinder
v. Shinder, 2018 ONCA 717, 142 O.R. (3d) 321.
[227]      
On the date of marriage, the husband held 48
shares in a business owned and controlled by his father: Shinder, at
para. 5.  Two years before the date of separation, the husband’s father
initiated an estate freeze with the consent of the husband and with the
intention to pass on the benefit of future growth of his business to his
grandchildren.  One asset held by the trust created by the estate freeze were
the husband’s 48 shares given to him by his father, for which the husband
received preference shares with a fixed value of $1.1M.  The trust also held shares
that were owned by the father.  The husband was a beneficiary of the trust,
along with the grandchildren.
[228]      
In Shinder, parties had entered into a
separation agreement.  The wife alleged that the husband had not disclosed he
was a beneficiary of the trust in prior sworn financial statements.  Because of
this non-disclosure, she sought to set aside a separation agreement.  The
husband argued disclosure of the trust had occurred.   He brought a motion for
summary judgment.
[229]      
The motions judge found the husband failed to
disclose he was a beneficiary of the trust.  The husband’s summary judgment
motion was dismissed:  Shinder v. Shinder, 2017 ONSC 4177, 96 R.F.L. (7th)
315 (ON SC).
[230]      
On appeal, the Court of Appeal held that the
motions judge erred in finding there was non-disclosure because the wife had
knowledge of the husband’s trust interest through her lawyer.
[231]      
Of importance to this case, the Court also held
that even if the omission of the husband’s interest in the trust in his
financial statements could be characterized as non-disclosure, s. 56(4) of the FLA
required the court to consider whether the implicated asset was “significant”. 
The Court found the husband’s interest in the trust was not “significant”
because it was a gift.  At para. 58, the Court explained:
[232]      
Ian argued that this statement made by the Court
of Appeal is obiter, and that the case was really about whether the
motions judge erred, on a summary judgment motion, in finding that there was non-disclosure
of the husband’s trust interest.
[233]      
After careful review of Shinder, I find
that the Court’s characterization of the husband’s interest in the trust as a
gift acquired during the marriage was not obiter.  It formed part of the
Court’s ratio decidendi.  The Court first found that there was
disclosure of the husband’s trust interest, which would have been sufficient to
dispose of the appeal.  The Court then went on to consider the result, namely
whether there was a genuine issue requiring a trial, even if there had been
non-disclosure.  There, the Court concluded that the husband’s interest in the
trust was a gift and excluded property. It was an equally sufficient basis to
dispose of the appeal.
[234]      
Even if para. 58 of Shinder were obiter,
along a spectrum, I find it is closer to being integral to the result or the
analysis that underlies the determination of the matter, and less incidental or
collateral to the analysis: R. v. Prokofiew, 2010 ONCA 423, 100 O.R.
(3d) 401, at para. 20.  This is because the Court of Appeal provided two
rationales for the disposition of the case, and either would have been
sufficient.
[235]      
It matters not that Shinder offered two
rationales for disposing of the appeal, with the second rationale being that
the husband’s interest in the trust was a gift. In The Catalyst Capital
Group Inc. v. VimpelCom Ltd., 2019 ONCA 354, 145 O.R. (3d) 759, the Court
considered whether issue estoppel and cause of action estoppel prevented a
subsequent action from proceeding.  The appellants argued that findings made by
the trial judge that gave rise to the estoppel arguments were not necessary to
his decision and that they were merely collateral.  The Court disagreed. 
Tulloch J.A. (as he then was) stated, at para. 32:
[236]      
Barb argued that Shinder is on “all
fours” with this case.[10] 
I agree.
[237]      
On the date of marriage, a spouse had a property
interest in shares of the spouse’s father’s business.  During the marriage,
those shares were realized or continued to be held by the spouse. With the
consent and cooperation of the spouse, and with the intention to pass on the
benefit of future growth in the father’s business to the grandchildren, an
estate freeze was implemented and created a new beneficial interest for the spouse
(along with the grandchildren) in a new trust.  With these facts, the Court
held “any additional benefits [the husband] might
receive under the trust would constitute a gift or inheritance acquired after
the date of the marriage and hence would have to constitute excluded property
as defined under the Family Law Act.”
[238]      
In my view, critical analysis in Shinder
is missing.  Namely, the Court did not analyze how shares that the husband
owned on the date of marriage were “acquired by gift…from a third person
after the date of marriage.”  Nor did it comment on whether the
husband’s interest in the trust on the date of separation constituted the same
property on the date of marriage, for which he would have been entitled to a
deduction.  The same property cannot be both an exclusion and a marriage-date
deduction: Knight v. Knight-Kerr, 2021 ONCA 686, at para. 25.  Even if the
husband’s ownership interest in the shares on the date of marriage was materially
different than his beneficial trust interest on the date of separation, the
husband would benefit from a “double deduction”: see Mittler v. Mittler,
1988 CanLII 8645 (ON SC), [1988] O.J. No. 1741 (ON SC), at para. 68.
[239]      
I identify these problems in Shinder
because a trial judge who considers reasons of an appellate court to be
problematic ought to provide reasons: Canada v. Craig, 2012 SCC 43,
[2012] 2 S.C.R 489, at para. 21.
[240]      
I have considered other appellate authority with
similar facts, but it does not resolve the analytical gap in Shinder. In
Brinkos v. Brinkos, the wife’s parents gifted the wife $224,000 prior to
the marriage.  After the marriage, the wife’s father made an additional gift of
$71,000.  Then, the wife settled the gifts of $224,000 and $71,000 in a trust
with her mother and brother as trustees and received an inalienable life
interest in the income of the trust.  Her father then made a further gift of
$100,000 to the trust. The Court of Appeal held that the wife’s income stream
derived from her father’s gifts of $71,000 and $100,000 during the marriage was
excluded.
[241]      
In Brinkos, the Court did not rule on
whether the wife’s own contribution to the trust, which consisted of the pre-marital
gift from her parents (i.e., the $224,000), was excluded.  This is because the parties
agreed that this sum of $224,000 was property “owned on the date of marriage”
and was therefore deducted from the calculation of NFP.  If the Court of Appeal
had ruled on this issue, it would be binding authority.
[242]      
This Court is bound to apply the law in the same
way as appellate courts when it finds facts similar to those relied upon at the
appellate level.  It cannot ignore legal precedent.  It can only do so when a
new legal issue is raised, or if there is a significant change in circumstances
or evidence: Canada (Attorney General) v. Bedford, 2013 SCC 72, [2013] 3
S.C.R. 1101, at para. 44; Craig, at paras. 18-23.
[243]      
Accordingly, I find that I am bound by Shinder
to exclude Barb’s interest in the NFT from her NFP on the date of separation.
[244]      
However, in the event I am wrong and for the
purposes of any appeal, I analyze whether Barb’s interest in the NFT is
excluded under s. 4(2)1 of the FLA.  I provide equalization calculations
based on two scenarios: first, exclusion of the NFT from Barb’s NFP, and
second, an alternative that reflects what I would find if it were included.  In
these unusual circumstances, it is proper for a trial judge to determine the
facts and engage in legal analysis for appellate purposes: Bedford, at
para. 42-44.
[245]      
For Ian, this case involves a typical estate
freeze.  An owner of shares in a business utilizes the transaction to minimize
tax liability and pass wealth on to the next generation as a part of their own
inter-generational estate planning.  However, Ian characterized the transaction
as an “estate gel” because Barb was a beneficiary of the NFT, and as such,
retained an interest in the future growth in value of the SHL shares.  Had it
been a typical estate “freeze” and not a “gel”, Barb would have given away the
future growth in the common shares entirely to her children, and only
the preference shares would form part of her NFP.
[246]      
Ian stated that because Barb was the “freezor”
of the SHL shares and a beneficiary of her own assets, there was no gift from a
third person.  It was a gift to herself.  He further relied on the fact that
she received the vast majority of distributions from the NFT.  Her interest in
the NFT was, in pith and substance, derived from the transfer of her own common
shares in SHL to 4MK.
[247]      
Barb framed the issue differently.  She stated
that the Court, when looking at the transactions that embody the estate freeze,
must consider the intentions of the parties at the time.  It was Gordon’s
intentions to pass wealth to the next generation, and as such, the estate
freeze was Gordon’s, not Barb’s.  She said intention matters because it allows
the Court to view the estate freeze as two separate transactions, in
furtherance of Gordon’s intention to pass inter-generational wealth to his
issue.
[248]      
In one transaction, Barb sold her 90 SHL shares
to 4MK, with the NFT acquiring the future growth in value of those shares.  This
concluded her transaction, for which she received consideration of $24.5M in
preferred shares.  She did so without certainty of receiving any future benefit. 
In the other transaction, which Barb says is the gift, Gordon settled the NFT and
made Barb and her children beneficiaries as part of his estate planning.  The
NFT then acquired the growth value in those shares. Therefore, she submits it
was Gordon’s estate freeze and any benefit Barb acquired from the NFT was a
gift from Gordon.   She said the common law requirements for a gift were met.
[249]      
I can appreciate why the parties seek to
characterize the transaction as “Barb’s estate gel” or “Gordon’s estate freeze”. 
But, regardless of its characterization, the analysis must rest on the
statutory language for an exclusion under the FLA.
[250]      
Barb had the onus of establishing an exclusion
under s. 4(2): s. 4(3) FLA.
[251]      
Section 4(2)1 of the FLA excludes from NFP
calculations the value of “[p]roperty, other than a matrimonial home, that was
acquired by gift or inheritance from a third person after the date of the
marriage.”
[252]      
The FLA does not define the term “gift”. 
The Ontario Court of Appeal in McNamee v. McNamee 2011 ONCA 533, 106
O.R. (3d) 401, at paras. 23-24, provides authority for how the term is to be
construed in family law cases:
[253]      
Therefore, Barb must establish that:
[254]      
For reasons that I explain, I make the following
factual findings that are relevant to my analysis.
[255]      
However, even with these factual findings, I cannot
conclude that Barb’s interest in the NFT on the date of separation was a gift
acquired from a third person after the date of marriage.  I conclude it is not
excluded property under s. 4(2)1 of the FLA.
[256]      
Defining the property that is the subject of the
gift is critical.   It is relevant to determine what was gifted by whom and
when.  It is relevant when analyzing other cases that have assessed whether
property is a gift and is therefore excluded.  It informs the analysis as to
whether the same asset is both a date of marriage deduction and an exclusion.
[257]      
Barb’s position was that her beneficial
interest in the NFT on the date of separation was a gift from her father by
virtue of his establishment of the trust, pursuant to his wishes.  It was not
the value of the SHL shares themselves which were held, indirectly, by the NFT.[11]
[258]      
Barb owned the SHL shares outright during the
marriage, but she submits that when her father gave her the beneficial interest
in the NFT, the gift was created.   For certainty, Barb is not saying the gift for
which she is seeking an exclusion was made when she received the shares in 1993
from the BJL Trust.  Nor is she saying the gift was when her father paid $100
to settle the NFT, which then acquired 100 common shares in 4MK, and later
acquired the future growth in value of SHL shares.[12]
[259]      
It is also relevant that Ian did not allege that
this estate freeze was a sham or a fraudulent conveyance, or that Barb participated
in the estate freeze to avoid equalizing her interest in the SHL shares. It is
Barb’s beneficial interest in the NFT that Ian is seeking to equalize.
[260]      
The parties relied on the opinion evidence of
their respective experts, Mr. Gibney and Mr. Harris.  Both were qualified to
give opinion evidence on tax and estate planning.  Both gave helpful evidence
in terms of explaining estate freezes, the 21-year rule, the tax implications,
their understanding of this estate freeze, and how similarly situated families
may structure estate freezes for comparative purposes.  They are both clearly
knowledgeable and respected experts in these areas.  The Court is grateful for
their evidence.
[261]      
Prior to Mr. Gibney giving evidence, I raised an
issue as to the admissibility of what appeared in paragraph 4 of his expert
report.   He relied on parts of the NFT Trust Deed to interpret, what he
viewed, as Gordon’s “primary intention” to pass family wealth to Barb’s
children.  This was a function that, in my view, was reserved for the trier of
fact.  A voir dire was held, and I was persuaded that Mr. Gibney may be
able to offer helpful perspectives based on how trusts in an estate freeze are
typically constructed; however, I expressly reserved the right to determine the
proper interpretation of the NFT Deed and what it may say about Gordon’s
intention. To the extent either Mr. Gibney or Mr. Harris commented on Gordon’s
intentions or lack thereof from their interpretation of the NFT Trust Deed, I
disregard their evidence.
[262]      
Instead, I consider the evidence of Don and Barb
on this issue, as well as my own interpretation of the NFT Deed and other
documentary evidence.
[263]      
Don and Barb both provided evidence as to what
Gordon told them with respect to his intentions leading up to the NFT.  Ian
objected because it was hearsay.   I admitted it, subject to my assessment of
its reliability and what weight I would give it.
[264]      
Gordon’s intentions are relevant to determine if
Barb’s interest in the NFT was a gift.   Hearsay evidence can be admitted
pursuant to the principled exception to the hearsay rule of necessity and
reliability, if threshold reliability is met.  R. v. Khelawon, 2006 SCC
57, [2006] 2 S.C.R. 787, at para 47; R. v. Bradshaw, 2017 SCC 35, [2017]
1 S.C.R. 865, at para. 23.  The principled exception to the hearsay rule was
developed because “[i]n some circumstances, the evidence present minimal
dangers and its exclusion, rather than its admission, would impede
accurate fact finding”: Khelawon, at para. 2; R. v. Charles, 2024
SCC 29, at para. 45.
[265]      
The necessity criterion was met because Gordon
passed away in 2001. Barb's and Don's evidence is also necessary because it is
the "best available form" of evidence in the circumstances: R. v.
Baldree, 2013 SCC 35, [2013] 2 S.C.R., at para 103. Their evidence provides
additional insight that will assist the Court in interpreting the documentary
evidence.
[266]      
Early in the trial, hearsay evidence was adduced
from Barb and Don when its reliability could not be tested.  I admitted it
subject to my assessment of what weight, if any, I would give to it, aware that
there would be further evidence.  There was documentary evidence of Gordon’s
intentions with respect to his estate planning prior to 2001.  It appeared to
be consistent with the hearsay evidence received, which in my view, met
threshold reliability.  My determination of ultimate reliability would depend
upon my assessment of all the evidence at trial, including my credibility
assessment of Barb and Don.  Both were cross-examined.
[267]      
The Court may examine what a deceased settlor
said prior to his death when assessing, as a question of fact, a settlor’s
certainty of intention to create a trust: Elliott (Litigation guardian of)
v. Elliott Estate (2008), 45 E.T.R. (3d) 84 (Ont. S.C.), at para. 29,
citing Jones v. Lock (1865), 1 Ch.  App. 25; Paul v. Constance,
[1977] 1 All E.R. 195 (C.A.).
[268]      
At trial, Barb gave the following evidence as to
the circumstances leading to the estate freeze, her father’s role, and what she
understood about the transaction.
[269]      
Barb further testified:
[270]      
Later in Barb’s evidence, when asked about the
re-organization of the NFT in 2022 due to the 21-year rule, Barb answered that
it was “left to the kids”.  When asked why she wanted it left to the kids, she
testified “[b]ecause that was the intention of my father when he started this,
all those years back in 2001.”  She later provided the following answers in her
evidence in chief:
[271]      
On cross-examination, Barb’s evidence was consistent
on this issue.
[272]      
Don similarly testified that Gordon instigated
the estate freeze of Barb’s SHL shares in August/September 2001 and his in
December 2000, because Gordon’s cancer had come back.  He testified that this
was like in 1993, when Gordon had his first cancer scare. These concerns resulted
in him distributing the shares held by the BJL Trust to Barb, and the creation
of the 1993 Agreement the next day which restricted disposition of the shares
and ownership of the shares to Gordon’s issue.  He testified that these cancer
scares motivated Gordon to undertake this estate planning.
[273]      
Don testified that he attended meetings with his
father and his advisors regarding the estate freezes.  While he admitted he did
not understand trusts, he understood the intention of the DGL trust was
consistent with the long-term plan contained in the 1993 Agreement, namely to
continue the growth value in SHL shares to the next generations of the Lang
bloodline.
[274]      
Gordon’s intention to preserve the growth in
value of the SHL shares to his issue is consistent with the 1993 Agreement.  The
details of that agreement demonstrate that throughout Barb’s direct ownership
of the shares, she was restricted in what she could do with them.  Even though
Barb had direct ownership of them, Gordon’s control of those shares was
imprinted on them, if not by Gordon’s moral suasion over Barb and Barb’s desire
to please her father, then certainly by the 1993 Agreement and the existence of
the Control Corp.
[275]      
The NFT Deed, which Gordon signed, is consistent
with the intention of passing down exclusively to Gordon’s issue the ownership
and benefits associated with the SHL shares.  Barb and the children were named
as the sole beneficiaries.  The terms around the distribution of the NFT, had
as a default, an equal division of the trust assets among all five
beneficiaries (para 2(c)).  It restricted distributions of capital and income
to the children until they reached the age of majority.  It contemplated that if
Trustees sought to allocate or were directed to give capital or income to a
minor beneficiary, they shall hold it and keep it invested until the
beneficiary reached the age of majority (paras 3 (a) and (b)).  These
provisions demonstrate an intention to pass wealth solely to Barb and her
issue.
[276]      
Don and Barb’s actions were consistent with the
1993 Agreement and Gordon’s intentions in 2000/2001, when they agreed to the estate
freezes involving the shares they owned. I find the hearsay evidence of Gordon’s
intentions received from Don and Barb admissible.
[277]      
Ian argued that a negative inference should be
drawn from Barb’s failure to call lawyers at Lang Michener, and specifically,
Ms. Marni Whitaker, to give evidence as to whose intention it was to engage in
an estate freeze and create the NFT.   Mr. Harris, in his evidence, was taken
to a memo from Carl De Vuono of Lang Michener, dated March 29, 2000, addressed
to Marni Whitaker and Cynthia Cross with Arnold Englander copied.  Neither
party called any of these individuals to give evidence.  Don and Barb both
testified that Ms. Whitaker was the estates lawyer who prepared all the trust
agreements.
[278]      
This memo from Mr. De Vuono states that Don,
Stuart, and Barb “wish to implement a share freeze arrangement” and that they
will “establish a ‘gel’ trust, which as I understand it, will be a family discretionary
trust which will include each of Don, Stu and Barb as one of the beneficiaries.” 
It continues, “I believe Marni should obtain instructions from each of the
children and prepare a form of trust.”
[279]      
There was reference to another unsigned letter,
purportedly from Ms. Whitaker to Barb that described the NFT in high level.  It
was marked only as a lettered exhibit.  It was not presented to Barb during her
evidence.  Since neither its authenticity nor the truth of its contents were
established in evidence, I place no weight on this letter.
[280]      
I decline to draw a negative inference for the
following reasons.
[281]      
First, any potential evidence Ms. Whitaker might
give about whether it was Barb or Gordon’s intention to create the NFT and
Barb’s beneficial interest, would be protected by solicitor-client privilege.  At
a motion heard on June 23, 2021, Ian sought disclosure of Ms. Whitaker’s file
to understand “whether the 2001 reorganization was undertaken to defeat his
claims in the event of separation.” Pinto J. ruled that the information in the
file is protected by solicitor-client privilege. If Ms. Whitaker were called as
a witness, her testimony on who directed the establishment of the NFT would most
likely be subject to solicitor-client privilege.[13]
[282]      
I agree with Barb’s submission that drawing an
adverse inference would be inconsistent with the protection afforded to
solicitor-client privilege and would create an expectation that lawyers’
testimony be received.  As stated by Kristjanson J. in Goldstein v. Walsh,
2018 ONSC 2978, at para. 157:
[283]      
Second, the NFT Deed sets out Gordon’s
intention.  While anyone could have settled the trust, it was Gordon who
settled this trust and signed the NFT Trust Deed.  It provides evidence of his
intention that the wealth from the SHL shares were to pass inter-generationally
to Barb and her children, consistent with the 1993 Agreement.  I give this
documentary evidence that memorialized Gordon’s intention significant
evidentiary weight.
[284]      
Even if solicitor-client privilege were not an
obstacle and Ms. Whitaker testified about instructions she received from Barb
or Gordon, this would not have resolved whether Barb was acting on Gordon’s
wishes.  As explained, I am satisfied Barb agreed to do as her father asked. 
Ms. Whitaker could not have given evidence of private conversations Barb had
with her father.
[285]      
For these reasons, I find:
[286]      
Barb argued that the elements of a gift –
intention, acceptance, and delivery – manifest differently in the context of a
gift of an interest in a trust.  The existence of a trust is premised on three
certainties: “1) certainty of intention – the settlor must have intended
to create a trust, 2) certainty of subject matter – the trust property
must be sufficiently ascertained or ascertainable, and it must be sufficiently
certain as to how that property will be divided among the beneficiaries, and 3)
certainty of objects – the beneficiaries of a trust must be sufficiently
identified”: Oosterhoff, Chambers & McInnes, Oosterhoff on Trusts, 9th
ed. (Toronto: Thomson Reuters Canada Ltd., 2019), at p. 178.
[287]      
A beneficiary’s interest in a trust is created
at the inception of a trust when the three certainties are met and the trust is
constituted by the transfer of property: Knight v. Knight, 1840, 3 Beav.
148, 49 ER 58. Barb said there was certainty of intention because Gordon
intended to create a trust.  There was certainty of subject matter, because “he
instructed Barb to participate in the transaction in order to give effect to
Gordon’s intention to give the growth to Barb’s children”, and because Gordon
made a gift of $100 to the NFT for those shares.  The objects of the trust were
Barb and her issue.
[288]      
Accordingly, Barb said the gift of her
beneficial interest in the NFT occurred on August 22, 2001, when the three
certainties were met.  She said there was a valid gift because: 1) there was a
unilateral intention on the part of Gordon to gift an interest in the NFT to
Barb when the NFT was created on August 22, 2001.  Barb provided no
consideration for her interest in the NFT.  Barb did not seek to negotiate with
her father. She had no meaningful input in the transaction, other than her
cooperation in signing papers; 2) Barb would have known and accepted her
beneficial interest in the NFT at the same time she signed the trust deed; and
3) there was delivery of the gift since she received millions in dollars in
distributions from the NFT since it was formed.
[289]      
Where Barb’s logic fails is that Gordon did not
divest himself of property and transfer it to Barb (or her children), other
than his $100 used to establish a trust as settlor.[14]  As stated in McNamee,
for there to be a valid gift, “the donor must divest himself or herself of all
power and control over the property and transfer such control to the donee”: at
para. 25.
[290]      
Gordon did not own Barb’s shares when the NFT
was created.  At most, Gordon was a donor of $100 in which Barb has a
beneficial interest.  Aside from his $100, his property did not form the
subject of the enormous value of the trust.  It was the growth value in Barb’s
90 Class B common shares of SHL that formed the subject of the trust, which
Barb owned and sold to 4MK and which was then purchased by the NFT.  Or put
differently, the value of Barb’s beneficial interest in the NFT arose from her
own shares.
[291]      
I find that the three certainties of a trust
have been met and that the NFT is a valid trust.  Ian did not challenge the NFT
as being invalid or a fraudulent trust.  Barb submitted that her beneficial
interest was created before the NFT acquired the growth value in her shares,
and therefore, this Court should find that Barb’s subsequent contribution of
her own asset to the NFT a month later is not a gift to herself. This
conclusion is inconsistent with the evidence of what transpired.
[292]      
The estate freeze was Gordon’s plan, with which
Barb agreed to cooperate.  From its inception, according to Barb’s and Don’s
evidence, the plan was to make Barb’s shares the primary asset of the NFT so
that it could be passed on to future generations.  She was both a beneficiary
and a trustee of the NFT.  She knew that because she signed the NFT Deed before
selling her shares to 4MK.  I reject any suggestion that she sold her shares to
4MK, without knowing that their future value would become owned indirectly by
the NFT of which she was a beneficiary.
[293]      
Barb argued that, conceptually, the Court should
view the transactions separately.  In one transaction, Barb sold her shares to
4MK in exchange for preferred shares, with no guarantee of acquiring any growth
value.  She was then out of the picture, content with the consideration she
received ($24.5M in preferred shares) from having sold her shares.  In the
other transaction, Gordon settled the NFT making Barb and her issue
beneficiaries, consistent with his intention of passing wealth on to future
generations.  Any future benefit she acquired was a gift by virtue of the NFT.
[294]      
The problem with this argument is chronological.
Gordon settled the NFT first on August 22, 2001.  Its only asset was $100, but
the intention of it acquiring the growth value of Barb’s shares was agreed upon
by Barb and Gordon at the outset.  A month later on September 24, 2001, Barb
sold her shares.  It was only because of Barb’s sale of her shares to 4MK that the
NFT acquired the growth value of the shares, which in turn benefited Barb as a
beneficiary.  It also ignores the reality that the NFT’s acquisition of the
growth value of Barb’s shares was the plan from the outset.
[295]      
I have considered Barb’s argument that
“effectively”, she gave the shares back to Gordon so that he could make the
gift back to Barb and her children.  She relied on Ian’s testimony to support
this conclusion.  When Ian was cross-examined and asked whether Barb would have
given back all of the shares to Gordon absolutely, Ian said “probably, yes.” He
further testified that Barb would have done anything her father asked her to
do.  Ian also agreed he would have done anything for Gordon.
[296]      
Notwithstanding this evidence, I cannot conclude
Barb gifted the shares back to her father.  There was no legal transfer of the
shares back to Gordon.  There is no evidence of Gordon having accepted them
back.  He did not want them; he wanted their value to be passed on to Barb and
her issue.  Rather than gifting the shares to her father, Barb sold them to
4MK.  That was the transaction.  That was her bargain, for which she received
consideration.  There was also no evidence of the shares being delivered to
Gordon (i.e., the third requirement for a gift). They were delivered to 4MK.
[297]      
It was Gordon’s intention that Barb engage in
the estate freeze of her shares to pass on wealth to future generations.  She
did as her father asked.  However, this gratuitous act was not her father’s. 
It was Barb’s.  She gave up direct and certain ownership of the future growth
in value of the SHL shares.  Her gratuitous act to appease her father’s wishes
does not characterize Barb’s interest in the NFT as a gift from her father.  It
merely demonstrates that her father had “moral sway” over Barb.
[298]      
Ian’s counsel argued that if I were to find
Barb’s interest in the NFT was a gift from her father, it would invite other
spouses to shelter assets from equalization through a similarly constructed estate
freeze.  Barb’s counsel argued that this “floodgates” argument was nonsense. 
Every trust is different and family courts are accustomed to individualized
justice.
[299]      
I agree with the concern raised by Ian’s
counsel.  “The design of [the FLA] is to promote the goals of certainty,
predictability and finality in the resolution of property matters following the
breakdown of marriage”: Serra v. Serra, 2009 ONCA 105, 307 D.L.R. (4th) 1, at para. 56.  Barb’s shares
were acquired by gift before marriage, which she then made part of the NFT’s
assets during the marriage because it was what her father wanted her to do.  It
was open to Barb before or during the marriage to ask Ian to enter a domestic
contract, expressly excluding this asset from equalization.  It was also open
to Barb to legally transfer the ownership of the shares back to Gordon so that
he could truly (re)gift them back to Barb and her issue through an estate
freeze.  Neither occurred.
[300]      
This case is not unlike other family cases
involving trust interests that were subject to equalization, where the Court separated
out and excluded trust assets that were a gift from a third person acquired
during the marriage, from those assets which the spouse placed into the trust
during the marriage: see Brinkos. However, I acknowledge in Shinder,
the trust assets comprised both the husband’s assets and the husband’s father’s
assets, and the entire trust assets were found to be excluded under s. 4(2).
[301]      
The FLA does not carve out the exclusion
that Barb is asking this Court to grant.  Specifically, it does not permit a
spouse who acquires a gift before marriage to exclude the growth in value of
that gift during the marriage from NFP calculations, simply because the spouse
placed the growth in value of that gift into a trust.
[302]      
Barb relied on several cases to argue that her
beneficial interest in the NFT on the date of separation is a gift and
therefore, excluded.  But the critical factual distinction between those cases
and this one is that the property that became the subject of the trust was
gifted by a third party during the marriage.  Here, it was Barb’s own
asset, gifted to her before marriage, that became the property of the
NFT.
[303]      
In Clarke v. Read Estate, 12 RFL (5th)
305, 2000 CanLII 22457 (ON SC), the wife’s parents placed $60,000 and a
mortgage in a trust during the marriage with the wife as beneficiary.  At para.
60, the Court relied on the reasoning in Brinkos in considering whether
the trust assets that were given by the wife’s parents to the trust were
excluded.  It held that they were.
[304]      
In Brinkos, the Court of Appeal excluded
gifts the wife’s parents made to a trust during the marriage from NFP
calculations.  The Court did not have to rule on whether the wife’s own
contributions to the trust, which constituted pre-marriage gifts from her
parents, were excluded.  This is because parties agreed that this asset was
property “owned on the date of marriage” and therefore deducted from NFP
calculations.
[305]      
In Black v. Black, the husband’s father
created two estate freezes by incorporating a holding company, B Ltd.  The
father sold to B Ltd. his own shares in WDI and DTL, in exchange for voting
preference shares.  He then caused B Ltd. to issue to the husband and his other
son common shares of B Ltd. which they acquired by selling to B Ltd. shares in
WDI, which shares they had inherited from their grandparents.
[306]      
In Black, the husband was not claiming an
exclusion for the WDI or DTL shares that his father sold to B Ltd.  He did not contend
they were a gift.  Rather it was the potential “growth in value” of those
shares from the completion of the estate freeze to the date of separation which
he contended was a gift to him and his brother.  The wife argued that the
estate freezes were nothing other than purchases and sales for full
consideration that involved the active participation of the husband, his
brother, and his father. She said the husband and his brother purchased their B
Ltd. shares by transferring property already owned by them, and thus they cannot
be classified as a gift.
[307]      
Walsh J. concluded that because the husband
contended the shares sold by the father to B Ltd. were not a gift, their
increase in value must be included in NFP calculations as well.
[308]      
Barb said Black is distinguishable.  She
stated that the husband directly owned an interest in the “growth value” of B
Ltd. because he owned (some of) the common shares of the company, and he paid more
than $1.2M for them.  In this case, Barb’s interest in the “growth value” was
not directly owned by Barb (she did not own common shares of 4MK – only the
preference shares).  Barb also noted that she did not provide consideration in exchange
for becoming a beneficiary of the NFT.  She said that if the husband in Black
did not pay to receive the common shares in B Ltd., Walsh J.’s reasoning
suggested that the value of the common shares of B Ltd. would have been
excluded from his NFP.
[309]      
I agree that if the husband in Black had
not paid for shares in B Ltd., there may have been a gift from a third party,
resulting in an exclusion.   But like the other cases where an exclusion was
granted, there was a gift from a third person.  In Barb’s case, there
was no gift of shares from a third person.
[310]      
Barb also relied on Reisman v. Reisman,
2014 ONCA 109, 118 O.R. (3d) 721.  In that case, on the date of marriage, the
husband had a beneficial interest in a trust, settled by his father, which held
preference shares in MRL, a holding company.  During the marriage, an estate
freeze was undertaken.  The preference shares in MRL owned by the trust were
converted to Class A common shares in a new holding company. The husband
included the value of these shares in his NFP.  The husband also received Class
D common shares in MRL which represented 25% of the future growth in MRL.  The
husband argued these Class D shares were a gift from his father.  The Court of
Appeal agreed with the husband and held the Class D shares were a gift from his
father.
[311]      
Reisman is also
distinguishable.  The Court of Appeal permitted the exclusion of the Class D
shares because: (a) Initially, the wife accepted that the Class D shares
constituted a gift and the trial judge refused to permit her to withdraw that
admission. The Court of Appeal agreed with the trial judge’s reason for the
refusal; and (b) the father gifted to the husband in separate transactions the
Class D shares during the marriage, and were therefore excluded: Reisman,
at paras. 48, 52.  In this case, there was no admission by Ian that Barb’s
interest in the NFT was a gift.  Also, there was no gift of Barb’s shares
during the marriage from a third person.  She owned them.
[312]      
Finally, Barb relied on Armstrong v.
Armstrong, 1997 CanLII 24458 (ON SC), [1997] O.J. No. 4137, 34 R.F.L. (4th) 38, which is
similarly distinguishable.  A trust was established as part of an estate freeze
during the marriage by the husband’s father.  The court held that the husband’s
beneficial interest in the trust, for which he paid no consideration, was a
gift from a third person (the husband’s father) during the marriage.
[313]      
For these reasons, I would find that Barb’s
beneficial interest in the NFT as of the date of separation is not excluded
under s. 4(2) of the FLA.  At most, what is excluded is Gordon’s initial
gift of $100.
[314]      
Because I would find Barb’s interest in the NFT
is included in her NFP, I do not need to consider whether the same asset can be
both a date of marriage deduction and date of separation exclusion.
[315]      
On December 31, 2018, Barb sold personal
investments to 4MK and, in exchange, received a note receivable of
$12,592,318.  In 2019, some of these investments were sold and the proceeds
were paid to Barb, lowering the amount of the note payable to $8,744,662 on the
date of separation.  Barb claimed an exclusion for this asset because it is
traceable to the gift from Gordon in 2001.
[316]      
Ian did not dispute the value of the note
receivable on the date of separation of $8,744,662.  However, his position was
that since the NFT is not excluded property, the note receivable is not
excluded.  It is subject to equalization.
[317]      
Because I found Shinder is binding and
Barb’s interest in the NFT is therefore excluded, I find that Barb’s note receivable
payable of $8,744,662 is excluded by virtue of s. 4(2)5 of the FLA
because it was traceable to proceeds Barb received from the NFT.  Barb gave
evidence of purchasing these investments using the distributions she received
from NFT.
[318]      
If Barb’s interest in the NFT were not excluded,
I would find that the note receivable, valued at $8,744,662, is not excluded
property.
[319]      
I determine the value of Barb’s interest in the
NFT as if it is not excluded under s. 4(2) of the FLA.  Parties presented
weeks of evidence and argument on this issue.  It is in the interests of
justice that I determine the value of Barb’s interest, should my finding on Shinder
be overturned on appeal and to assist the Court of Appeal.
[320]      
The parties’ children were also beneficiaries of
the NFT.  As such, they may have an interest in the value I ascribe to Barb.  Before
I discuss the value of Barb’s interest in the NFT, I explain why I did not
invite further evidence from the parties’ children in determining Barb’s
interest.
[321]      
On October 19, 2023, Black J. heard a motion
brought by the parties’ children to be added as parties.
[322]      
In Reasons released on October 24, 2023, Black
J. dismissed the children’s motion: Lang-Newlands v. Newlands, 2024 ONSC
5989.  He found the children did not yet have a cause of action.  He was also
not satisfied with the children’s reasons why their motion was brought so late,
six weeks before trial in an Application commenced in 2019.  He stated at para
65:
[323]      
On the first day of trial, Barb’s counsel
brought a motion to bifurcate the trial to address first (a) whether Barb’s
interest in the NFT is property, and (b) whether it is excluded property
pursuant to s. 4(2) of the FLA.
[324]      
In an oral ruling, I dismissed Barb’s motion for
two principal reasons.
[325]      
First, I was not provided with a satisfactory
explanation as to why this motion was not brought sooner.  Parties planned for
this trial on the assumption that there would not be a splitting of issues. 
While Black J.’s ruling implied there might be a mid-trial ruling on Barb’s
interest in the NFT and whether it was excluded, and thereafter evidence from
the children might be obtained, this does not excuse Barb’s failure to bring
her motion sooner.  Parties had planned for this six-week trial to address all
issues, and it was Ian’s position that all the issues were interwoven.
[326]      
Second, Barb argued that if the trial were
bifurcated, the court could receive evidence from the children on their
interest in the NFT if it was not excluded.  In response to this argument, I stated
that if evidence is needed as to the children’s interest in the NFT, the
trustees would all be testifying (at that point in the trial, it was
anticipated Stuart would also give evidence, but he did not ultimately testify). 
In the exercise of their discretionary authority to distribute trust assets to
all beneficiaries, the trustees could speak to the children’s interest in the
NFT. I also noted that two children would be testifying (although only one
child actually testified, Spencer), and they could also give evidence of their
interest in the NFT.
[327]      
Finally, I stated that as the trial unfolds and
prior to Judgment, if I deem it necessary in the interests of justice and to
ensure a fair disposition, I may invite further evidence from the children on
their interests in the NFT.
[328]      
I find it is not necessary to receive evidence
from the children, even if Barb’s interest in the NFT is included in her NFP.
[329]      
Unlike Barb, the children are not spouses and
the broad definition of “property” in the FLA does not apply to them.  Their
interests are different.  The NFT is a discretionary trust in which the trustees
exercised uncontrolled discretion.  The children, as beneficiaries of a
discretionary trust, do not have a property interest in any specific asset of a
trust: Spencer, at para. 37.  As such, their cause of action and
standing is questionable.
[330]      
Two of the trustees, Don and Barb, gave evidence
regarding their intentions with respect to the distribution of the NFT’s assets
to the children.  Don, Barb, and Stuart had complete and unfettered discretion
to determine distributions consistent with the NFT Trust Deed.  Don and Barb’s
evidence was consistent.  While Stuart did not testify, a majority of trustees
is all that is required to make decisions.  And in any event, the NFT’s assets
have since been distributed to the children through a new trust due to the
21-year rule.  They have been distributed in a fashion that seeks to treat the
children equally.
[331]      
For these reasons, I see no merit in re-opening
this case to receive further evidence from the children.
[332]       The NFT owned 100 common shares of 4MK, which in turn owned 78
common shares of SHL. The valuation experts, Ms. White and Mr. Ranot, both
adopted an adjusted book value approach when valuing the SHL, and consequently,
4MK and the NFT. The experts agreed that the gross value of 4MK’s ownership of
SHL shares was $668.7M.[15]
[333]      
The experts, however, differed on two issues:
(a) whether its entire value or a proportion of its net value should be
allocated to Barb because she was one of five beneficiaries, and (b) whether a minority/illiquidity
discount should apply.  There were other modest valuation differences that
turned on where the experts applied tax.  Mr. Ranot applied more taxes at the
SHL level; Ms. White applied them at the 4MK level.
[334]      
Barb stated that the value of her interest in
the NFT is equivalent to 20% of the trust value.  She assigned a 20% value to
herself, being a pro rata distribution of the trust value among all five
beneficiaries (i.e., Barb and her four children).  Ms. White provided calculations
if the Court were to find a 20% pro rata distribution was appropriate.
[335]      
Barb also stated that a 50% minority and
illiquidity discount should be applied to the value of the NFT.  Ms. White
shared this view.  This was to reflect, among other things, Barb’s lack of
control as a minority shareholder in SHL.  Ms. White relied on several facts to
support her opinion that a 50% discount is reasonable.  She also stated that
this case is factually similar to LeVan v. LeVan where a 50% discount
was applied.
[336]      
Ms. White calculated that, if Barb has a 20%
interest in the NFT with a 50% minority and illiquidity discount, it produces a
net value of $40,386,000, and if equalized, results in $20,193,000 payable to
Ian.
[337]      
Ian argued that the full value of the NFT should
be included as Barb’s property.  Ian acknowledged that some cases have applied
a pro rata method.  However, he argued some judges have opted to base
value on the degree of control exercised or exercisable by the beneficiary to a
trust.  He argued that Barb is one of three trustees, the other two being her
brothers who act in accordance with her wishes. He also argued that Barb
received the vast majority of distributions from the NFT, and that her requests
for distribution were never denied which demonstrates that the trustees acted
in concert.  Mr. Ranot shared this view.
[338]      
Ian argued that no minority or illiquidity
discount should be applied, or that there should be at most, a modest one of
5%.  This is the view of his expert valuator, Mr. Ranot, because while Barb
does not control SHL or its subsidiaries, she is part of a related group that
controls SHL and acts in concert with them (i.e., her brothers).  Mr. Ranot
distinguished this case from those Ms. White relied upon.
[339]      
If Barb’s interests in the NFT was included in her
NFP property, I would find that 20% of its value at the date of separation
should be assigned to Barb for the following reasons.
[340]       When a spouse is one of several beneficiaries of a discretionary
trust, a pro rata method of valuing the spouse’s interest has been
applied in several cases: see Sagl; Kushnir.  Interestingly, at
para. 37 of Sagl, the court held that after considering trust law and
the definition of property under the FLA, the “fairest and most
equitable result” would be to treat the trust assets as being deemed to have
been distributed equally among beneficiaries on the valuation date.
[341]      
There are, however, other cases, such as Tremblay
and Mudronja, where the Court has considered whether a spouse, who was a
beneficiary and a trustee, effectively exercised control over the trust and its
distributions such that the entire value (or near entire value) of the trust
should be allocated to the spouse.
[342]      
In Mudronja, the court allocated the
entire value of the trust to the husband, because he was the sole trustee, had
the power to appoint himself as beneficiary, and the unlimited discretion and
ability to distribute all trust assets to himself as a beneficiary: at para.
100.
[343]      
In Tremblay, at para. 32, Phillips J.
looked at various factors to determine whether or not a spouse, as a beneficiary,
had actual control of a trust in determining whether it is “property” under s.
4(1) of the FLA.  In my view, in this case, the contextual factors relied
upon by Phillips J. are better suited to determine the value of a spouse’s
beneficial interest in a trust, not whether it is “property”.  Those factors
include:
[344]      
For reasons given, the intention of the NFT, at
the request of Gordon, was to pass wealth on to Barb and her issue.  It was
expressly contemplated in para. 6(b) of the 1993 Agreement, which Barb signed
the day after she received her shares from the BJL Trust.
[345]      
The NFT Deed also contemplated equal
distribution to Barb and the children once they reached the age of majority,
and if the Trustees did not agree on an unequal distribution when the trust was
wound up.
[346]      
It was the intention of the trustees to distribute
trust assets among the beneficiaries equally and fairly.  Don gave compelling
evidence of this fact, which I accept.  He recognized his fiduciary obligation
to all beneficiaries.
[347]      
Between 2001 to 2019, according to Ms. White,
Barb received over 91.6% of the distributions of the NFT valued in excess of
$33M.  Ian also relied on this fact; just over $3M were made to the children,
while $33M were made to Barb.
[348]      
No doubt Barb received more than an equal
distribution, as compared to her four children.  However, the children were
between the ages of 9 and 13 when the NFT was created in 2001.  They were between
the ages of 27 and 34 in 2019 when the parties separated.  Don testified that
he recognized that when distributions were made to Barb, they benefited the
children who were minors for much of this period.  I am satisfied that Ian and
Barb spent these funds on the children, and in particular, millions on horses
for Wesley who is an accomplished equestrian.  In 2017, Barb also began paying quarterly
allowances from funds she received – $50,000 for Ian and $25,000 to each of the
children.  Barb also spent funds she received on properties the family enjoyed
and on debt.  Following separation, Barb purchased two condos for the children.
[349]      
Two of the most significant distributions
occurred in 2015 ($9,000,000) and 2017 ($17,160,980), totalling $26M of the
$33M distributed to Barb (or 78%).  Mr. Butler, Barb, and even Ian in his
cross-examination, gave evidence confirming how these funds were primarily
spent.  I am satisfied that they were used to pay debt incurred by the family,
for horses for Wesley totalling more than $7 million (not including $60,000 in
expenses per month related to the horses), and for investments for which Barb
holds a note receivable of $8.7M.
[350]      
For these reasons, while Barb received the vast
majority of distributions from the NFT, those distributions benefited the other
beneficiaries.  They also benefited Ian and will benefit him in terms of
equalization of the properties they jointly owned if Barb’s interest in the NFT
is included in her NFP.
[351]      
Don also gave evidence that any unequal
distribution to Barb was accounted for in the 2022 re-organization.
[352]      
For these reasons, I place little weight on the
fact that Barb received the vast majority of the distributions.  The age of the
children, the fact that millions were spent on them, that Barb gave regular
allowances to the children and Ian, and the structure off the 2022 re-organization
all suggest Barb did not retain the sole benefit of the distributions made to
her.
[353]       Ian relied on the fact that Barb was a beneficiary and a trustee.
[354]      
The evidence suggests that Barb, in her role as
trustee, did not control its distributions.  Barb was a homemaker.  She did not
have the business or financial acumen to be the directing or controlling mind
of the NFT. She had limited knowledge of the Lang businesses, the NFT or her
own family’s financial affairs.  She was one of Gordon’s children, and the NFT
governed the distribution of wealth to her and her children.  In this sense, it
is not surprising she was one of the trustees, as she would have knowledge of
her and her family’s needs and could communicate such to her brothers as co-trustees.
[355]      
If there was a directing mind among the three
trustees, I would find it was Don.  Don had been extensively involved in the
family business since 1982 and served as the CEO of CCL in or around the time
the NFT was established.  He was the president and a director of SHL, a
director of SIL, and a trustee of the NFT and his family trust, the DGL Trust.
Don was also a 50% owner of the Control Corp., and with Stuart, controlled
SHL.  Ian in his cross-examination, acknowledged that Don is “the boss of
everything”.
[356]      
Unlike Tremblay, Barb does not have the
power to appoint additional trustees.  Although, in para. 5(b) of the Trust
Deed, the Trustees (or a majority of them) could appoint additional trustees.  
Ian argued Barb, with at least one of her brothers, could have exercised this
authority.  He also cited a February 2015 email Don sent to Barb suggesting the
number of trustees reduce from three to one.  I place little weight on this.
Despite having the power to reduce trustees and Don’s suggestion they do so,
the trustees were never reduced.
[357]      
Ian pointed to the lack of evidence of any of
Barb’s requests for distribution being outvoted by the other trustees.
[358]      
While Barb was never outvoted, there was no
evidence of Barb making a request having to go to a vote.
[359]      
There was no requirement that Barb be part of
the trustees’ decision.  The trustees could decide by majority vote and therefore
were not required to involve Barb (i.e., by Don and Stuart).  Don’s evidence,
which I accept, is that he was a consensus builder and the trustees never had
to make decisions by majority vote.  Don sought and was successful in having
trustees reach decision by consensus.
[360]      
The Minutes from the meetings of the NFT
trustees have little evidentiary significance.  They showed that Barb declared
a conflict and did not vote in some instances when distributions were made to
her, but she did participate in others.  This is not telling of whether Barb
always got the distributions that she requested.   The evidence favours the
conclusion that Don sought consensus, he controlled the business and controlled
Barb’s request for liquidity, and often proposed that she sell 4MK’s shares if
she needed more liquidity than what SHL dividends or the NFT could provide.
[361]      
Barb received over 91% of distributions: $3M was
distributed to the children and $33M to Barb.  However, I do not conclude that this
was because she had direct or indirect control of the NFT.
[362]      
It is helpful to review how the NFT and Barb
obtained cash following the estate freeze in 2001.
[363]      
SHL and SIL hold voting control of CCL shares
(Class A and B voting shares).  When CCL pays dividends, a fair share goes to
SHL.  SHL, through its board, then decides whether they reinvest or pay a
dividend.  This is subject to the Control Corp.  Therefore, Don and Stuart
control what dividends are paid to SHL shareholders.  Don testified he decides
on the dividends.  I accept his evidence.
[364]      
From 2001 to 2018, there were significant
increases in SHL dividends on account of the success of CCL.
[365]      
When SHL paid a dividend to shareholders, 4MK
received dividends because it held 90 class B common shares of SHL.  Barb is the
sole director of 4MK.  As such, she can decide to take dividends through her
preferred shares, and if not, they are passed on to the NFT.
[366]      
Put simply, for the NFT to have cash to
distribute to its beneficiaries, it needed to receive dividends from 4MK (which
Barb controlled). 4MK’s dividends came from SHL.  At the same time, the capital
that the NFT held in the growth shares of SHL continued to grow.
[367]      
The sources of cash from 4MK from 2001 to 2023
consisted of:
[368]      
The following chart, prepared by Mr. Butler,
shows the amounts received by 4MK between 2001 and 2023, totalling $68M without
adjustments for their taxable nature (some are taxable and some were paid out
on tax paid basis):
[369]      
The sources of cash Barb received from 2001 to
2023 are:
[370]      
The following chart, prepared by Mr. Butler,
summarizes the payments Barb received between 2001 and 2023:
[371]      
After reviewing all of the evidence, I find the
following facts drawn primarily from the evidence of Don, Barb, and Mr. Butler. 
Ian did not challenge the accuracy of the figures in the charts above.
[372]      
A telling fact is from Ms. White’s evidence. 
From her analysis, she noted that while Barb’s distributions from the NFT were
significant, totalling $33.4M or 91% of all distributions, they represented
only 4.7% of the NFT’s value on the date of separation.  If Barb had control
over the NFT (or SHL), one would assume she would have taken a much larger
share. This demonstrates that distributions to Barb were neither unreasonable
nor disproportionate.
[373]      
Given these factual findings, I conclude that
the history of NFT distributions to Barb were not made for her sole and
exclusive benefit; the interests of other beneficiaries were also considered. The
distributions also benefited Ian. I further find that the majority of
distributions from the NFT (82%) were a result of Don’s decisions, and not in
response to a request for distribution from Barb. I do find, however, that Barb
did seek liquidity in some years and Don advised that Barb had to sell some of
4MK’s SHL shares. She did in 2008, 2009, and 2013. The history of distributions
and the way in which requests for distributions were considered by the trustees
do not suggest Barb exercised control of the NFT.
[374]      
For these reasons, I reject the inference that Barb
controlled the NFT because she received the majority of distributions.
[375]       Barb controlled 4MK as its sole director.  As such, she controlled which
of 4MK’s assets from SHL would funnel up to the NFT for distribution.   However,
Don and Stuart controlled entirely the funds that 4MK would receive, through
the Control Corp.
[376]      
The various roles Don played in the NFT’s
acquisition of wealth demonstrate that he, rather than Barb, controls the NFT. 
If the SHL Board approves a dividend or capital pay out, it must be approved on
Don and Stuart’s direction through the Control Corp.  If Don, as trustee of the
NFT, was of the view that Barb was not releasing funds from 4MK to the NFT and
allowing it to carry out its objectives, he could “turn off the tap” and limit
what was paid to 4MK.  Don played many roles and had fiduciary responsibilities
in each role to different stakeholders.  His evidence was that the NFT was not
an ATM.  I am satisfied Don would not permit Barb to exert the type of control,
for her own benefit, that Ian suggests Barb could have exercised.
[377]      
The evidence of Mr. Ranot supports the
conclusion that Barb, through her control of 4MK was not siphoning funds from
it for her own benefit, and to the exclusion of the NFT.  He noted that in his
income reports, in the six years from 2016 to 2021, 4MK received $31.5M in
income and paid it out as dividends to the NFT.  4MK distributed all that
was available.  He made this point, to then argue, that the NFT then paid over
90% of these amounts to Barb.  However, for reasons given, I am satisfied these
funds benefited Barb and her children and are not evidence of Barb’s control of
the NFT.  By paying these funds out to the NFT, Barb relinquished any control
she may have had.
[378]      
Finally, I find that Barb lacked the knowledge and
expertise to exert the type of control that Ian suggests.  Theoretically, Barb
could have arrested the flow of funds from 4MK to the NFT, but she didn’t.  Don
exercised overarching control over SHL and the NFT.  Barb’s complete reliance
on Don for advice and approval of payouts made to her renders any suggestion that
Barb had de facto control unfounded in the evidence of how Barb and Don
operated.
[379]      
I have considered the evidence from Mr. Howard
Lerner, which Ian relied upon.  Mr. Lerner is an accountant who did accounting,
bookkeeping and tax preparation work for the Lang family and their corporations
for at least 30 years.  Ian relies on Mr. Lerner’s e-mails to challenge Barb
and Don’s evidence about the lack of control Barb exercised in the NFT.
[380]      
Ian states that the emails, mostly between 2015-2017,
demonstrate a pattern of Mr. Lerner giving instructions to Ian, which he asks
to pass on to Barb, about the transfer of various funds from 4MK to the NFT and
then to Barb, without referencing trustee approval.  In one email, Mr.
Lerner asks Ian to tell Barb that she can transfer funds from 4MK to the NFT,
from the NFT to the children’s accounts, or if Barb likes she can “take it all
herself.”  On cross-examination, Mr. Lerner clarified that the trustees would
have to agree on distributions from the NFT to Barb.  Mr. Lerner was not a
trustee.  The fact that he did not reference trustee approval in a handful of
emails is not proof that trustee approval was not obtained, or that the
decisions on distributions were directed by Barb.  In fact, several of the
emails relate to the two lump sum capital distributions in 2015 and 2017, which
was initiated solely by Don.
[381]      
Mr. Lerner’s emails were primarily with Ian, not
Barb.  Mr. Lerner testified that he had discussions with Ian, not Barb, about
selling SHL shares and that he did not give Barb advice on this issue (although
he did prepare memos to her explaining certain transactions).  He testified
that she would have received advice from someone else.
[382]      
None of Mr. Lerner’s evidence is inconsistent
with Barb’s evidence on the allowances to the children, which she sometimes
used for the children’s expenses.  Mr. Lerner testified that he usually never
met with Barb, except to deliver an income tax return for her signature
annually.  Therefore, he would not have information from her about any control
she exercised.
[383]       Don gave evidence with respect to the 2022 re-organization of the
NFT, stating that it was similarly structured upon the principles of equality
and fairness among all five beneficiaries.  Ian argued that (a) the 2022
re-organization was done after Ian advanced his claims, (b) that in the
re-organization Barb continues to exercise control, and (c) that Don’s answers
in cross-examination about the 2022 re-organization suggest he lacked an
understanding of the transaction.  I deal with this last issue first.
[384]      
After review of the transcript, it appears that
Don was asked about a statement in a letter Ms. McCarthy sent to Mr. Youdan on
September 14, 2022 regarding the reorganization. Don responded: “I was not
involved in this trust discussion”. He did not state that
he was not involved in the trust re-organization.  Similarly, when he
was taken to an affidavit of Mr. Butler and the charts attached to it, Don
stated he was not involved in the preparation of the charts that sought to
explain the various steps and transactions for the 2022 re-organization. I
accept that his answers suggest he lacked specific details of the various
transactions in the trust reorganization. However, Don explained that he read
Mr. Butler’s affidavit about the 2022 re-organization, that he recalled
conceptually what they were doing but he “was not involved in the design or
intimately writing this up.”  He further stated, “I understood conceptually
what was going on and that’s as far as it went.”
[385]      
I do not accept that Don’s answers suggest he
did not understand and seek to implement the principle of equal distribution of
the NFT assets among the beneficiaries in the 2022 re-organization.  The fact
that Don, who is not a trust, estates, or commercial lawyer, did not appreciate
all the details of the complex 2022 re-organization is not surprising.  His
role is as a trustee.  I find that Don understood the concepts underlying the
trust re-organization but did not necessarily understand all of the details in Mr.
Butler’s charts after his brief review.
[386]      
The 2022 re-organization was complex and
involved many transactions. In summary and as demonstrated in the chart below,
the 2022 re-organization occurred in two phases.
[387]      
In May 2022, Stuart settled a new trust for
$100: the BJL 2043 Trust.  Its trustees are Barb, Don, Spencer, Harrison, and
Mr. Butler.  Its discretionary beneficiaries are Barb’s issue, and any
corporation in which the trustees have determined that one or more
beneficiaries have a material interest.  In May 2022, the NFT sold its shares
of 4MK valued at $569M, and 4MK issued 11 new classes of preferred shares with
a fixed redemption level of $569M.
[388]      
In August 2022, four new holding companies were
created to hold classes of shares for each of the four children, with the
children owning common shares in their holding companies.  Barb acquired new
special shares that were valued less than those of her children.
[389]      
Regardless of how I view Don’s answers in
cross-examination about the reorganization, Mr. Butler’s affidavit and his
charts (similar to the one above) demonstrate that among Barb and the children,
the reorganization was grounded in principles of equality, consistent
with Don’s evidence in chief.
[390]      
Jordan, Spencer, and Harrison received a value
of about $100M of preferred shares each in their holding companies. Wesley
received a lesser amount of $60M but on a different tax basis.[18] Don explained that this was
because of Wesley’s residency status as located outside of Canada.  And Barb
received significantly less - $37.4M in preferred shares to account for prior
distributions.
[391]      
Don also testified that there were four more
classes of shares (valued at $20M each (E, F, G, and H preferred shares) for
distribution to the children when Wesley’s residency situation is worked out. They
are also intended to account for the use of prior distributions for horse
expenses, for which Wesley benefited and the other children did not. A further
class of J shares (valued at $80M) was also created to “top up” all five
beneficiaries at some point.  Don testified as to how the class of J shares
would be distributed:
[392]      
Ian argued that the court should look at the
2022 reorganization in the context of distributions after Ian advanced
claims in this case.  He notes that Barb continues to exercise control over 4MK
and distributions from 4MK to the children’s new holding companies.   His
suggestion is that the reorganization was merely to demonstrate to this Court
that the principle of equality was implemented, but that Barb continues to
exercise control.  He further argued that while the children are the
beneficiaries under the new BJL 2043 Trust, a further beneficiary can be any
corporation in which the trustees have determined that one or more
beneficiaries has a material interest.  Ian argued that Barb could become a
beneficiary of the 2022 Trust by virtue of being a shareholder of a “material
corporation” later added as a beneficiary.
[393]      
I find these allegations improbable.  According
to Mr. Gibney, there would have been “catastrophic” tax implications in the
range of $150M had the trust not been re-organized in 2022 due to the 21-year
rule.  Mr. Harris and Mr. Ranot did not dispute this. Given the complexity of
the transactions necessary to implement the 2022 re-organization involving
$569M in assets, it is improbable it was undertaken to make this Court find that
the principle of equality among beneficiaries was undertaken, when in fact, the
assets remained solely under Barb’s control.
[394]      
Don’s and Barb’s evidence on the reorganization
was credible.  The 2022 re-organization is consistent with the 1993 Agreement
and Gordon’s intentions throughout.  I have no apprehension that Barb will
divert assets from 4MK for her own benefit and to the exclusion of her
children, inconsistent with the intention of equal distribution.  Spencer, who
also testified and is a trustee of the BJL 2043 Trust, gave evidence that he
does not see the value of his holding company as being his; he sees it as
belonging to future generations.  He gave no evidence that he was holding this
value for his mother.
[395]      
For these reasons, I am not persuaded that Barb
exercised control over the NFT or the distribution of its assets.   It was Don
who was the directing mind of the NFT as trustee.  In this role, the principle
of equal distribution among beneficiaries governed. While the vast majority of
the NFT’s distributions were made to Barb, Don was aware that she used those
funds for the benefit of the children and Ian.  The most significant of those
distributions, totalling $26M, were not requested by Barb.
[396]      
Accordingly, if Barb’s interest in the NFT were
included, I would find that it is appropriate, fair and just to assign only 20%
of the value of the NFT to Barb.
[397]      
If Barb’s interest in the NFT were included in
her NFP, I would find that a 50% minority/illiquidity discount should apply.
[398]      
I begin with an assessment of Ms. White’s and
Mr. Ranot’s evidence as much of their evidence related to minority/illiquidity
discounts.  I then describe the valuation concepts of minority, illiquidity,
and blockage discounts, and then analyze whether a minority/illiquidity
discount applies.
[399]      
Ms. White and Mr. Ranot are both extremely
knowledgeable and highly respected valuators.  To their credit, they were able
to mostly agree on global values in this case with only minimal valuation
differences; however, they disagreed on discounts and other valuations that
called upon the valuator’s discretion in relation to the facts of this case.
[400]      
Generally, I preferred the evidence of Ms. White
over Mr. Ranot.
[401]      
By my recollection, Ms. White attended only
parts of the trial and Mr. Ranot attended virtually everyday of trial.  He saw
the facts unfold as I did.  I found he was overly rigid in his application of
valuation principles, without sufficient regard to the facts.  I do not find
that he assumed the role of an advocate, as suggested by Barb’s counsel.  He is
a respected valuator who has given evidence before this Court often.  However,
I find he did not give due consideration to the facts when giving his opinion
on valuation while testifying.  Similar to a statement made by Mesbur J. in Please
v. Herjavec, 2018 ONSC 7749, at para. 89, I found myself questioning
whether Mr. Ranot’s opinion would have been the same had he been retained by
Barb.
[402]      
In opining that Barb was part of a control
group, Mr. Ranot gave little regard to the overarching control exercised by the
Control Corp., Ian’s acknowledgement that Don was the “boss of everything”, and
the entirely passive role Barb played in the corporate structure.  Barb’s lack
of financial sophistication ought to have been readily apparent. At one point
in his cross-examination, he made a modest concession that Barb may have simply
been acquiescing to Don, but this did not change his opinions as set out in his
reports.
[403]      
Mr. Ranot sought to attribute the entire value
of the NFT to Barb because Barb received over 90% of its distributions. He appears,
however, to have placed no weight on the evidence that Barb disproportionately
spent these funds on the family home and family debt, that Barb was supporting
the children who were also beneficiaries, notably Wesley on a
multi-million-dollar equestrian career, and that a majority of those
distributions were the product of business decisions made solely by Don without
a request from Barb.
[404]      
As explained later in my Reasons, when Mr. Ranot
gave opinion evidence of Barb’s income, his application of the Child Support
Guidelines was rigid and made without regard to Barb and the family’s
history of spending.
[405]      
In comparison, I found Ms. White to be
reasonable and fair.  Her answers were clear and helpful.  On
cross-examination, she was not argumentative, and she conceded certain points. 
She explained the positions she took and the valuation principles she applied in
forming her opinions.  She explained areas where facts are relevant to the
application of valuation principles in her discretion, and why certain facts
leaned one way or the other in the exercise of her discretion.  She relied on
objective facts, such as previously decided cases or the evidence that was
given, to ground the opinions she took.
[406]      
She applied a 50% minority/illiquidity discount
to assets Barb held on the date of marriage, in part, because she viewed it as
consistent and fair, even though it would increase the equalization payment Barb
would have to pay.
[407]      
Mr. Ranot’s opinion was that at most, a 5%
discount should apply to both date of marriage and date of separation assets.
[408]      
The principal reason for the different opinions turns
on whether Barb is part of a related group that has historically exerted family
control
[409]       As explained by both Ms. White and Mr. Ranot, a minority discount,
or a discount for an absence of control of a corporation, is a valuation
principle when valuing a shareholder’s interest in a corporation.  It can be
applied when there is an absence of the power to control a corporation and the
consequential inability to (a) control the future economic or strategic
direction of a corporation or the election of directors, or (b) dictate timing
and amounts of dividend payments.
[410]      
The rationale for applying a minority discount
is explained succinctly in Andrew Freedman & Timothy Martin, Financial
Principles of Family Law, (Toronto: Thomson Reuters Canada, 2021), § 8.1:
[411]      
A minority interest in a corporation can be
described as follows:
[412]      
When determining the appropriate discount,
various factors can be considered:
[413]      
A liquidity discount is different from a
minority discount.  However, as noted above, Canadian courts have applied one
“minority discount” that combines the impact of lack of control and
marketability (illiquidity).  A liquidity discount and its indicia are
described as:
[414]      
A minority discount may not be applicable where
family or group control exists:
[415]      
I have carefully considered the opinion evidence
of Ms. White and Mr. Ranot, I begin with some objective factors relevant to a
minority/illiquidity discount.  I then turn to whether family control is present
in this case such that no discount or a modest discount should apply.
[416]      
Barb did not control the shares through the
NFT.  For reasons given, I do not find that Barb exercised control over the NFT
and its indirect investment in SHL.   Even if she could wrestle that control
from her brothers as co-trustees, she still had to seek and obtain her brothers’
approval to do anything with the shares.
[417]      
Barb controls 4MK through her preferred shares,
but Barb could not unilaterally exercise control of SHL, its dividend
distributions, or the sale of SHL shares.  The evidence was clear that it was
Don who determined SHL dividend distributions and Barb required Don and
Stuart’s permission for 4MK to sell any of its shares.
[418]      
4MK owned roughly one-third of SHL and is a
minority shareholder of SHL.  While it is entitled to a third of the equity of
SHL, 4MK only controlled 4% of the votes.  4MK, effectively, had no control of
SHL.  This is a significant factor underlying the rationale for a minority
discount.  What purchaser would be interested in purchasing an asset valued in
excess of $600M to only have 4% of the vote?
[419]      
This would have real implications for a
potential purchaser.  For example, when CCL pays dividends to SHL, SHL can
determine what to do with it – distribute it or invest it in other assets.  4MK
does not have a say in whether SHL distributes dividends it receives.
[420]      
Similarly, 4MK has no say on SHL’s dividend
policy.  As Ms. White explained, there is a relatively low dividend yield on
CCL shares (0.8% to 1.2% between 2017 and 2019).  Some corporations will pay
dividends as high as 3.5% and others at 0% if they are reinvesting their
capital.  Barb cannot alter that rate through 4MK.  While the value of 4MK’s
interest in SHL is large, 4MK cannot get higher dividends approaching market
rate.  This is a consequence of being a minority shareholder.  This low yield
rate could influence a purchaser.
[421]      
Compounding the 4% voting control of SHL, is the
existence of the Control Corp and the overarching control it exercised through
Don and Stuart.  Even if a shareholder could achieve an outcome at the SHL
level with only 4% voting control, the ultimate decision rested with the
Control Corp. and Barb or any potential purchaser are excluded.
[422]      
When CCL pays dividends to SHL, SHL can
determine what to do with it – distribute it or invest it in other assets.  4MK
does not have a say in whether SHL distributes dividends it receives.
[423]      
In terms of illiquidity, Ms. White acknowledged
that the concepts that relate to a minority discount overlap with illiquidity
discounts.  An illiquidity discount is intended to reflect the inability to
monetize an asset, which is related to control. Shareholder agreements
typically prescribe how shareholders can monetize their shares.
[424]      
In this case, there was no shareholder agreement
between 4MK and SHL.  There was no way for 4MK to monetize its shares without
the unanimous consent of all shareholders of SHL.
[425]      
In addition, for 4MK to obtain liquidity, SHL
would need to monetize its assets.  SHL assets are primarily in CCL. To
monetize them would be difficult without significantly impacting the underlying
operations of CCL.  CCL has Class A and B shares.  Class A shares are voting
shares and most are owned by SHL.  Class B shares are non-voting, which are
held mostly by the public.  While SHL owns 95 percent of voting control shares,
if you combine the classes of shares, SHL holds only 17 percent of the overall
value of CCL.   This raises liquidity issues at the SHL level.
[426]      
Furthermore, 4MK does not own any CCL shares
directly.  4MK’s only way of accessing or unlocking the value of CCL shares was
through its ownership of SHL shares, which would require SHL Board and Control
Corp. approval.
[427]      
With respect to blockage discount, if SHL sought
to sell a large volume of its CCL shareholdings at one time, the market would
be flooded and share prices would drop.  To avoid this, a company may sell
shares in chunks over time.  In which case, a blockage discount would apply to
account for the time and risk associated with waiting to monetize the shares. 
Ms. White was of the view that this would be relatively modest – in the range
of 5% - 10%.  Mr. Ranot determined it would be around 7%.
[428]      
The rationale for a minority discount is to recognize
that a purchaser of a minority position in a corporation will lack control over
decision-making in the corporation: Levine v. 1751060 Ontario Inc., 2016
ONSC 3691, 132 O.R. (3d) 269, at para. 83.   A lack of control can be
exemplified by an inability to “control the direction of the company, determine
dividends or bonuses, or require that shares be redeemed or transferred”: McLean
v. Dahl, 2017 ONSC 1288, at para. 229.  A minority, or more specifically,
an illiquidity discount can also recognize that shares may be subject to
limitations on sale: McLean, at para. 229.
[429]      
When applying this rationale to the facts above,
it is readily apparent that Barb and 4MK lack control over SHL and CCL.
[430]      
Ms. White opined that a reasonable combined
discount that accounts for minority interests and liquidity and blockage
discounts would be 50%.   Ms. White explained that she applied the same
discount to Barb’s interests at the date of marriage.  This is because the BJL
Trust, in which Barb was the sole contingent beneficiary, held 25% of the
shares in what became SHL.  There was no shareholder agreement that would allow
Barb to monetize this asset.   She did not control SHL (or its predecessor at
the time).   Also, Barb did not control the BJL Trust and could not realize
this interest.  She also did not control the GSL Trust.
[431]      
Mr. Ranot did not dispute that SHL and the
Control Corp. exercised de jure control.  However, his opinion rested on
whether family control existed in this case.
[432]      
Ms. White similarly acknowledged that in
family-owned companies, you begin with a presumption of family control, but
then turn to the facts to assess whether family control actually exists.  The
experts differed on whether the facts suggest family control is present. I turn
to this issue next.
[433]      
Mr. Ranot states that this case involves family
control of SHL and in his view, Barb acts in concert with her brothers.  He
states family control exists where (a) a related group combines to control an
entity and (b) that group has a history of acting in concert.  He relies on the
following definition of family control from Canada Valuation Service in
his November 9, 2023 critique report of Ms. White’s August 30, 2023 report:
[434]      
Mr. Ranot views Barb, Don, and Stuart as constituting
a related group that controls SHL.  Ms. White says they are related by blood,
but she would not conclude that Barb is a part of related group because of Barb’s
lack of control and her exclusion from the Control Corp.
[435]      
Barb and her brothers have 100% voting control of
SHL.  Barb only has 4% voting control; her brothers have a combined 96%.  Barb
is not part of the 96% group.  Theoretically, Barb could join forces with one
of her brothers, resulting in them exercising 52% voting control.  For this
reason, it is arguable that Barb is part of a control group that could combine
to control SHL.
[436]      
However, any direction approved at the SHL level
by majority vote would be subject to the Control Corp. agreeing with that
direction.   Barb owns no shares in the Control Corp., which exercises de
jure control over SHL.  Again, theoretically, one might assume that if a
brother voted with Barb at the SHL level, that same brother would seek to
achieve the same outcome at the Control Corp. level.  But that brother would
only have 50% of the vote at the Control Corp. level – not a majority to
control the Control Corp. – and therefore, could not achieve the direction he
and Barb sought at the SHL level.[23]
[437]      
Therefore, I would find that Barb is not part of
a related group that controls SHL.  The exercise of ultimate control by the
Control Corp. was by design and it specifically excluded Barb.  It was
consistent with the purpose and intent of the corporate structure.  A Control
Corp. with control over the Lang family businesses was in place, likely since
1977, and most certainly by 1986, well before 4MK and the NFT were established.
[438]      
I would also not find there is a history of Barb
acting in concert with her brothers such that she, with her brothers, has de
facto control of SHL.
[439]      
Mr. Ranot, in his examination in chief and
cross-examination, stated that despite the absence of Barb having de jure control,
several factors demonstrate that Barb, Don and Stuart have a history of acting
in concert:
[440]      
In considering whether there is a history of
Barb acting in concert with her brothers, I consider the extent to which they
acted in concert “in controlling the operations and direction of the company
and the liquidity of their investment” and “whether they will likely
continue to do so, including eventually selling their collective interests
together.”[24]
As this is the rationale for not granting a minority discount in family
controlled businesses, it is the appropriate measure to test whether they acted
in concert.
[441]      
I find that Don was the directing mind of the
NFT, SHL, and CCL.  Ian agreed that Don was “the boss of everything”.  He is
the executive chairman of the board of CCL, Director of the Control Corp, President
and Director of SHL, and a trustee of the NFT.  He has fiduciary obligations as
a trustee to all beneficiaries of the NFT, to shareholders of SHL and CCL, and a
contractual duty under the 1993 Agreement.
[442]      
In the exercise of his various fiduciary responsibilities,
I find that Don placed greater importance on his fiduciary obligations to shareholders
and the NFT’s beneficiaries over his personal relationship with his siblings,
and that he would not accede to their requests simply because of their familial
relationship.
[443]      
For example, when Don dealt with requests for
liquidity from Barb and Sherry, he explained he did not and would not change
corporate dividend policies to accommodate their requests because of the impact
it would have on all shareholders and business operations.  His testimony was
that he expected his siblings to live within existing dividends, and if not,
they had to consider a sale of their shares.   This is what happened when
Sherry’s shares were bought back by SIL and she was paid out over several years
(between 2009 and 2015), and when Barb sold 12 of her original 90 shares.
[444]      
Don testified that SHL would not have the
liquidity to purchase 4MK’s shares back.  He testified that SHL would not sell
its assets in CCL to satisfy a debt of a shareholder.  In deciding whether SHL
would buy back shares, Don said he would have to do what is best for the
business and shareholders.
[445]      
In addition, I find that Barb did not play any
active role in the management of SHL.  She did not have the business or
financial sophistication to do so.  She did not understand what occurred at SHL
Board meetings.  There was no evidence of Barb controlling, proposing,
let alone directing, how the operations or direction of SHL or CCL were to be
carried out.  On these issues, she deferred entirely to Don’s direction. The
only exception would be her selling 12 of 4MK’s SHL shares.  But even this
required Don and Stuart’s permission.
[446]      
I also find it unlikely that Barb, Don, and
Stuart will eventually sell their collective interests together.  This is a test
within a family control analysis.  Barb and Don have an intention to retain the
shares for future generations.  Had there been some aspect of control by Barb,
say within a shareholder agreement, that permitted Barb to sell 4MK’s shares,
it would impact my assessment of her control and liquidity.  There was no such
agreement.  With Stuart, different considerations are at play because he has no
children.  The plan involving the disposition of his shares was contemplated in
the 1993 Agreement.  When Sherry’s shares were sold, the family did not sell
their collective interests together.
[447]      
From these facts, I conclude that Barb was truly
a de facto minority shareholder.  Like any other arm’s length minority
shareholder, she could raise her wishes with the majority shareholder with
regard to business direction or liquidity and hope Don and Stuart would agree. 
The only evidence of her asserting her interests was in relation to the sale of
12 SHL shares.  Barb was a passive player and lacked control.
[448]      
I turn to the evidence Mr. Ranot relied upon to
demonstrate that the family acted in concert.
[449]      
Mr. Ranot relies on several emails to assert
that there is a history of Barb and her brothers acting in concert.  I have
reviewed them.  They do not support the inference that Barb acted in concert
with her brothers in controlling the operations and direction of the company
and the liquidity of their investment.
[450]      
Several of these emails were put to neither Don nor
Barb.  To assess whether they acted in concert on the topics contained in the
email, it was necessary to hear from them.  I address some of them briefly.
[451]      
In an email Don wrote on February 25, 2013, he spoke
of Barb selling her shares and then he proposed, alternatively, that SHL may
increase its dividend which might help Barb retire her debt.  Don testified
that in a prior email, included within the same chain from three days prior, he
had shared CCL quarterly results.  As a result, he expected an increase in CCL
dividends.  He explained that he was merely suggesting to Barb that there may
be an increase in SHL dividends because of the CCL quarterly results, but that
it may not be enough to retire Barb’s debt.  This explanation is consistent
with email chain.  I do not accept this email as evidence of Don increasing SHL
dividends to deal with his sister’s debt.
[452]      
In an email dated July 9, 2013, Don discussed
SHL donations on Stuart’s behalf that would reduce their capital gains.  He
asked Barb and Stuart, in a separate paragraph, if they would get back to him about
what shares they wished to sell.  This email was not put to Don, but it was put
to Barb.  Barb answered that she cooperated with her brothers around Stuart’s
donations.  Without further context, I cannot infer it suggests they acted in
concert on SHL donation policy to benefit shareholders. Don was not seeking
their input or opinion. If anything, it suggests Don was the controlling mind
and merely telling Stuart and Barb what was happening.
[453]      
In an email chain from June 15, 2016 to July 11,
2016, Don wrote to Mr. Lerner about how to value shares that Stuart and Barb
may be interested in selling.  Mr. Lerner proposed a higher share price that
would have benefited his siblings, and Don said he would prefer an averaging
approach that was less favourable to his siblings.  Don forwarded the email to
his siblings advising of the lower share price if they wished to sell.  He did
not ask for their views on the share price.  This email was not put to Don or
Barb.  If anything, it demonstrates that Don discussed with his siblings a
possible sell of their shares, and Don preferred a price that was less
favourable to them and more favourable to SHL.
[454]      
In an email dated February 21, 2017, Don asked
Barb to sign documents relating to donations made by SHL.  There would be
nothing unusual if Barb, as a director of SHL, performed an administrative
function of signing documents.  The email did not call for any decision-making
in relation to the operations or direction of the company.
[455]      
In an email dated May 17, 2017, Don writes to
Stuart and Barb.  He states, “Given our recent dividend increases at CCL, I
thought with your support, we should increasing [sic] this amount to $6,000,000
per year beginning with the dividends that are now being paid.  I hope to sign
the cheques this Thursday.”  He then explains how, because of significant
donations made by SHL, future dividends will be paid on a non-taxable basis for
a very long time.  He concludes by saying, “I hope you support the strategy and
please let me know if you have any questions.”
[456]      
Barb testified that she acknowledged receiving
it.  She understood that Don would be increasing dividends because “the company
was doing better.”  Don testified that he sent it to Barb and Stuart because
they were two other SHL directors.  He wanted their views.  He explained that
he copied Mr. Lerner to correct Don if he misspoke.
[457]      
The email suggests Don was soliciting support
from Stuart and Barb around a new dividend policy of SHL, but I do not find it
demonstrates Don and his siblings acted in concert.  This email was sent on Wednesday
May 17, 2017, and Don stated he hopes to sign the cheques “this Thursday.” 
To announce a proposal to significantly change dividends and then inform
recipients that you hope to implement it within 24 hours, does not suggest that
Don was seeking meaningful input around strategies for the business.  Instead,
it suggests he was telling them what this dividend policy would be.
[458]      
In any event, it is clear Barb did not understand
the policy, only that she would be receiving more in dividends because “the
company was doing better.”  This was consistent with other answers she gave at
trial, demonstrating her limited understanding of the operation and management
of SHL and CCL.
[459]      
On May 1, 2018, Don wrote to Stuart, Barb and
Mr. Englander about plans to acquire a life insurance policy to pay future tax liability
on the deemed disposition of Stuart’s shares upon his death.  The plan would
see a $64.5M policy being taken out, with premiums paid by SHL and Scotiabank, with
the debt to Scotiabank being paid over 20 years.
[460]      
Don was questioned about this life insurance
policy, but not this email.  He confirmed that a policy was in fact obtained by
SHL, but on terms different than what was set out in his email (i.e. annual
premiums of $7M per year for 10 years with a death benefit of $100M).  He
explained the policy was obtained, consistent with the 1993 Agreement, to
ensure SHL shares remained held by Gordon’s issue.
[461]      
Mr. Ranot explained that SHL shareholders would
benefit from this life insurance policy because SHL would get an immediate cash
infusion that would be paid out to SHL’s shareholders (Don’s and Barb’s holding
companies) to enable them to purchase the shares held by Stuart’s holding
company.  Ms. White agreed that this would result in a benefit to the other
shareholders, including Barb, if she were still alive.
[462]      
Don and Barb were never asked about this email. 
The Court had no evidence of Barb’s involvement in this decision, if any.  No
evidence was received of discussions among Don, Barb, Stuart and Mr. Englander
that resulted in them agreeing to a life insurance policy that was different
than what Don proposed.  Whether they were acting in concert on this business
decision is not in evidence.
[463]      
And finally, on May 9, 2019, Don writes to
Stuart, Barb, and Mr. Englander advising that because of past charitable
donations, SHL has accumulated a sizeable capital dividend account and would
thereby be able to pay out non-taxable dividends for a very long time.   Mr.
Lerner suggested that rather than declare capital dividends with associated
filings with CRA, they instead file one election for the full amount of the
annual capital dividend and then pay out a capital dividend every three
months.  Barb responded the same day, stating: “That is fine with me and thank
you for doing all of this.  You really do a lot for Stu and I and please know
it is so appreciated.”
[464]      
Barb’s counsel asked Mr. Ranot about this
email.  He was asked whether Barb’s response could be seen as Barb acquiescing
to Don, rather than acting in concert with her brothers. Mr. Ranot agreed.
[465]      
From my assessment of all the evidence, I would
not use “acquiesce” to describe Barb’s response to proposals Don made. Acquiesce
means “to accept or consent to something without protest.”[25]  There was no evidence
to suggest that Barb may have protested to what Don proposed.  Rather, I find Barb
was entirely passive to whatever Don determined was appropriate for the
direction and management of SHL.  She was not like Sherry, who was disruptive.  Barb
relied on and trusted Don to make decisions.
[466]      
In any event, I do not see this email as reflecting
a decision regarding the operations or directions of SHL.  The subject of the
email is administrative, and I do not see it as evidence of them acting in
concert.
[467]      
In all, I find Barb was “just ‘riding with’ the
majority because [she] cannot determine strategic plans, appoint management or
dictate dividend policies.  Financial Principles of Family Law, § 8.1
[468]      
Mr. Ranot states that he was not provided
evidence of disagreement among Barb, Don, and Stuart “in the management of SHL
nor of Don and Stu acting unilaterally.”
[469]      
I agree that there was no evidence of the three
siblings disagreeing.  But this has little significance and is not surprising when
considering that Don prioritized the business and its operations, and that Barb
went along passively.   The absence of evidence of a disagreement does not
provide evidence that they acted in concert.  She was just riding with the
majority.
[470]      
One-page from the transcript of Stuart’s
questioning on August 23, 2021 was attached to Mr. Ranot’s Limited Critique
report.  Mr. Ranot relies on one question and answer, namely:
[471]      
Mr. Ranot’s report was marked as a lettered
exhibit.  The transcript itself was not admitted in evidence.  Stuart did not
testify. There was argument as to whether this question and answer should be
read-in, and Ian’s counsel advised that Ian is not seeking to admit it.  As
such, it is not in evidence.
[472]      
No discount was applied when Barb and 4MK sold to
SIL 12 SHL shares.  When its shares were sold in 2008, Stuart’s holding
company, Belacqua Holdings, also sold shares at the exact same price of
$1,050,000 per share.  However, this is not indicative of the fair market value
of these shares on the date of separation if Barb were to sell them all at once. 
In my discussion of the KPMG reports, I discuss how a sale of shares between
related parties is different than a valuation for family law purposes.
[473]      
As Mr. Ranot explained, if you are a minority
shareholder who is part of a related group, then it is far more likely the related
group will sell as a cohesive group to one buyer, such that a minority discount
would not be appropriate.
[474]      
But there is no evidence that the Lang family
would sell their shares as a cohesive group. Instead, there is evidence to the
contrary.
[475]      
Don’s evidence was that the shares were to
remain for the benefit of future generations within the Lang family.  If Barb
could somehow force the sale of all her shares, Don’s evidence was that SHL
would not have the liquidity to acquire them.  Barb’s market for the sale would
be limited to her family, due to the 1993 Agreement.  If she could negotiate a
non-family purchaser, the objective factors noted above would seriously
undercut the sale price.    All of these factors suggest a minority /
illiquidity discount is appropriate.
[476]      
Mr. Ranot delivered a production letter, dated
September 13, 2023, in response to Ms. White’s August 30, 2023 report.  Among
other things, he asked for (a) supporting documentation of Barb’s requests for distributions
from the NFT and when such requests were denied; and (b) details of votes among
NFT trustees and SHL shareholders where Barb or 4MK was outvoted.
[477]      
In response, Ms. McCarthy wrote:
[478]      
I cannot conclude these answers establish
parties acted in concert.  The fact that Barb did not make unreasonable demands
for greater liquidity from her brothers, and therefore, there is no resulting
evidence of her being outvoted, is not evidence they acted in concert.
[479]      
Barb received a $5M loan from SHL at 2% interest
rate after separation.  It was paid back within a year through a subsequent
loan from Don.  I place little weight on this as an indicator of Barb acting in
concert.  The funds were spent primarily to purchase condos for two children
since they no longer resided at Valleyanna.  It was not free.  Interest was
paid.  It was paid back within a year.
[480]      
For these reasons, I do not find that Barb acted
in concert with Don and Stuart to exercise control over the economic direction
and liquidity of their collective investment to their mutual benefit.  They are
not likely to dispose of their collective interests together.  Therefore, I would
find a minority/illiquidity discount is appropriate.
[481]      
Ms. White applied a 50% minority/illiquidity
(and blockage) discount rate after she considered the following.
[482]      
She considered Barb’s inability to sell and
monetize 4MK’s shares in SHL to be a severe liquidity issue, because of her
lack of control and the need to get agreement from Don and Stuart.
[483]      
She was not aware of SHL selling large amounts
of CCL shares.  She identified a history of selling some CCL shares on the open
market, but not a significant number.
[484]      
She testified that it is a judgment call as a
valuator to fix an appropriate discount, based on other similar cases.  She
considered a higher discount of 90% because 4MK may never be able to monetize
its SHL shares.  She also considered a 0% discount, for example, if SHL were to
sell its shares of CCL, but there was no indication of such an intention from
her understanding of the facts.  I agree that there was no evidence of such an
intent.  Don had no interest in selling off CCL.
[485]      
She landed on a 40%-60% discount rate based on LeVan
v. LeVan, 2006 CanLII 31020 (ONSC) which in her view had facts almost
identical to this case.
[486]      
In LeVan, the Husband’s father created a
highly successful family business, Westcast. The Husband’s parents developed a
complex corporate structure with various holding companies and a family trust. 
Trust and shareholder agreements were established to ensure control of Westcast
remained with the family and that shares were not owned outside the family, including
by spouses of family members.
[487]      
At the date of marriage, the Husband and his
three siblings each held 25% of the common shares of three companies: RyVan,
GrannyCo, and RWL.  These companies held voting shares in Westcast.  The
Husband’s mother had voting control over GrannyCo, and his father had voting
control over RWL. The Husband, his siblings, and their issue were also discretionary
income and capital beneficiaries in Family Trust I.  The trustees were the
Husband’s parents. This trust held voting shares in Westcast and 100% of common
shares of 1098994 (a holding company), which held more shares in Westcast and
RyVan.
[488]      
On the date of separation, the Husband owned
100% of a holding company, 1250238.  This holding company held 25% of the
shares of RyVan, and 25% of the shares of FWDAJ.  Both RyVan and FWDAJ held
voting shares in Westcast.  The Husband’s mother had voting control over FWDAJ.
[489]      
In addition, Family Trust II was created by the
time of separation.  The shares of 1098994 held by Family Trust I were transferred
to this trust and converted into preference shares.  The Husband received 25%
of the preference shares, and 25% of the common shares were transferred to his
holding company, 1250238.
[490]      
At both the date of marriage and date of
separation, the Husband and/or his holding company held shares that represented
a minority interest in a company that was controlled byhis parents. At the date
of marriage, the husband had a contingent income and capital interest in Family
Trust I which was controlled by his parents.
[491]      
The wife’s valuator, Ms. Linda Brent considered
various factors when valuing the business interests controlled by the husband’s
parents.  They included the Husband’s lack of votes to control Board of
Directors; lack of control over Family Trust; history of dividend payments;
family relationship; and restrictions on share transfer.
[492]      
Ms. Brent opined that a 40 – 60% minority/illiquidity
discount should apply to (a) the Husband’s date of separation interest in FWDAJ
(his father had voting control); and (b) the Husband’s date of marriage interests
in GrannyCo, RWL (his parents had voting control), and Family Trust I (his
parents were trustees, but Ms. Brent noted it was arguable that a higher
discount could apply to the trust interest because distributions were subject
to the discretion of the trustees): see LeVan, at para. 149.
[493]      
Backhouse J. accepted Ms. Brent’s valuation.  Significant
discounts as proposed by Ms. Brent were applied: LeVan, at paras. 238-245.
[494]      
Ms. White also considered F. v. V., [2002]
O.J. No. 3900, which had similar facts and a 40% minority discount was applied. 
In that case, the Applicant’s father gifted her shares in a holding company,
which she owned at marriage and separation.  The holding company held shares in
an underlying operating business.  The Applicant’s father held 2,000 voting
preferred shares, and 200 common shares were issued to each of his children,
including the Applicant. During the marriage, the holding company sold its
interests in the operating business and it acquired investments. When the
father died, his interests in the holding company were transferred to a spousal
trust in favour of his wife.  When the wife died, the Applicant became a
beneficiary of the trust.
[495]      
The Applicant, like Barb in this case, could not
redeem her shares in the holding company without the approval of its Board.  The
Applicant had no means to force the sale of her shares.  The Court found at
para. 62 that: (a) there was no viable market for the shares; (b) she could not
declare dividends or cause her shares to be redeemed or transferred; (c) the
Applicant did not have control and could not influence or direct the company;
and (d) the only potential purchaser might be another family member, and there
was a lack of evidence to suggest this was a possibility.  A 40% discount was
therefore applied.
[496]      
According to Ms. White, Barb’s inability to
force SHL to do anything – including increasing SHL dividends or selling its
shares of CCL – is the crux of the problem.  In addition to the corporate
structure and absence of control, Barb was constrained by the 1993 Agreement
that required the unanimous consent of all shareholders for 4MK to sell SHL
shares and restricted the market of share owners.  That Agreement does not
contain a mechanism for 4MK to monetize its investment in SHL.
[497]      
Ms. White understood there was no anticipated
liquidity event planned, whereby SHL would sell off its CCL shares valued at
$2.1 billion.  Ms. White referenced Don’s testimony that SHL intended to retain
CCL intact for future generations because it generated income, subject only to
a limited sale of CCL assets for the purpose of diversifying SHL’s holdings (as
was done in 2015 and 2017).   Given the absence of an anticipated liquidity
event, Ms. White viewed a higher discount to be appropriate.
[498]      
She explained to the Court that a considerably
higher discount rate might be considered if 4MK were never able to monetize its
investment in Barb’s lifetime.  However, given that the Court in LeVan
had very similar facts, Ms. White landed on a 40-60% discount rate.
[499]      
For these reasons, Ms. White applied the 50%
minority/illiquidity discount.  She did not apply a discount to other assets
Barb owned on the date of separation, namely:
[500]      
If a minority/illiquidity discount were to be
applied, Mr. Ranot opined it should be no more than 5%.  His opinion was
informed by his view that Barb is part of a related group that acts in concert,
but I rejected that proposition.
[501]      
His view that a 5% rate should apply is based on
seven reports KPMG prepared that valued SHL shares as of April 30, 2013; May
15, 2015; February 28, 2017; June 26, 2017; August 25, 2021; May 24, 2022; and
May 30, 2023.
[502]      
The reports were prepared for various valuation purposes:
(a) income tax purposes; (b) potential purchase/sale of SHL shares solely between
Lang family members; or (c) purchase/sale of SHL shares between Lang family
members and related corporations and charities.
[503]      
All seven reports identified either a 5% or
5-10% discount for lack of voting control.  They reasoned that as between Barb,
Stuart and Don, no one had voting control.  Some reports that considered
related family member transactions also included a 5 – 10% marketability
discount because KPMG stated there was no evidence to suggest shareholders
would act as a cohesive group in terms of selling their combined interests.
[504]      
I place little weight on the KPMG valuation
reports. No one from KPMG testified.  I am reluctant to place weight on their
opinions of discount rates given that every report was prepared for a specific
purpose, and the reports consistently stated that they should not be relied
upon for any other purpose.  None of the reports were prepared for a family law
purpose.
[505]      
The KPMG valuations relied on the same
definition of fair market value, as did Ms. White and Mr. Ranot in their reports,
however, Ms. White explained that this is standard.  Valuators know that there
are different factors that affect valuations depending on the purpose for which
the valuation is being prepared.
[506]      
Ms. White explained, when valuing shares for
income tax purposes, there is a presumption of family control.  The KPMG
reports that provide income tax valuations do so in the context of related
party transactions, which is not part of the definition of fair market value
used in her report, nor in Mr. Ranot’s reports.
[507]      
She explained that in the context of valuing a
private company, valuators will often notionally lift restrictions (i.e. “between
informed and prudent parties acting at arms length”), value the asset, then
consider various factors as they relate to the particular shares being valued
and in relation to the purpose of the valuation report.  Ms. White explained this
is what she did.  She started with a presumption of family control, then
considered the particular facts to determine whether a minority/illiquidity
discount applied, and then valued the discount.
[508]      
Similarly, when KPMG valued share transactions
between related parties, it is not looking at transactions between parties
acting at arm’s length.  Ms. White and Mr. Ranot both relied on valuations as
between parties acting at arm’s length.  Ms. White explained that the
definition of value for the purposes of the KPMG valuations among related
parties is quite different than fair market value.
[509]      
Ms. White also testified that the KPMG reports
did not distinguish among the different classes of shares.  While each of the
shares have votes and seem similar, KPMG did not assess or analyze the control
attaching to the shares and the votes indirectly attaching to them, which are
vastly different.
[510]      
I found Ms. White’s explanation of this to be
informed and persuasive.  None of the KPMG reports are prepared for family law
valuation purposes.  Only one values all of 4MK’s shares, but the valuation is
done for income tax purposes. None of them analyze the absence of control
exercised by Barb and 4MK in comparison to that exercised by her brothers or
their holding companies.  None of them considered the family law valuation of
4MK’s shares.
[511]      
Mr. Ranot notes no minority discount was applied
to the sale of Sherry’s shares, which were valued at $23.5M.   However, Ms.
White explained that that was a related party transaction, and it happened a
long time ago.  Therefore, Ms. White argued it is not comparable.
[512]      
I agree.  What happens between related parties
for income tax purposes, or even related parties for the purposes of share
purchase/sale is different and not relevant to the determination of fair market
value for family law purposes on the date of marriage or date of separation.
[513]      
Don gave evidence that, because Sherry was
disruptive, he would have paid a premium for her departure from the business.  In
contrast, Barb was passive and deferred to her brothers.  Even if no discount
was applied to Sherry’s buy-out, it appears there may have been a factual basis
for not applying one, unlike the present case.
[514]       Mr. Ranot noted that both his and Ms. White’s valuations relied on
CCL’s publicly traded share prices on the relevant date, and that the vast
majority of such trades involve extremely small minority interests.  Therefore,
Mr. Ranot states a minority discount is already built into the share price both
valuators used as a starting point.
[515]      
On cross-examination, Ms. White acknowledged
that she used CCL trading price in valuing CCL.  She also agreed that controlling
shares of CCL could be worth more than the publicly traded price.  However, that
would require a special purchaser.  She confirmed that in her valuation report,
she determined fair market value on an intrinsic value basis, defined as:
[516]      
Ms. White explained that she did not consider a special
purchaser.  That is, a buyer who would be interested in buying CCL or synergies
in operations, in finance, or in management so that it could, on a combined
basis, increase its profits over and above those of two individual corporations. 
In such a circumstance, a potential buyer would pay for those synergies.  But as
Don testified, CCL is many, many times larger than its nearest competitor. 
Therefore, she concluded that the potential for such a buyer would be remote. 
She further explained that the prospect of CCL being put up for sale was not
foreseeable.  This was consistent with Don’s evidence.  He did not contemplate
selling the business.
[517]      
Ian’s counsel relied on para. 167 of Le Van.
It recounts that the Husband’s expert in that case, Mr. DeBresser, cited a
study of public company buy-outs which found that 84.1% of companies studied
sold for higher than the trading price.  Mr. Ranot similarly relied on a Business
Valuation Resource study, indicating that the average control premium
across nine industry sectors for the period from 2010-2019 ranged from 36.7%-45.5%
to support his conclusion that no minority discount should apply.
[518]      
Ms. White conceded that if there were a
potential buyer for CCL, with its controlling interest purchased, a control
premium, rather than a minority discount, would apply.  However, she stressed
that in valuing 4MK, 4MK does not own CCL shares.  4MK owns shares in SHL.  Neither
Barb nor 4MK can direct a sale of CCL shares.  They can’t even direct a sale of
SHL shares.  Ms. White applied a 50% discount on the value of the SHL shares held
by 4MK, not on the value of CCL shares held by SHL.
[519]      
I prefer the position taken by Ms. White.  It is
grounded in the facts of this case, and the reality of what 4MK owns and Barb’s
lack of control over SHL or CCL shares.  The studies that Ian’s counsel and Mr.
Ranot rely upon are detached from them.  There is no evidence of a potential
purchaser of CCL.  I have no means to assess whether the conclusions in the
expert report cited in Le Van or the study cited by Mr. Ranot are
comparable to the facts of this case.  I find they are distractions and not
relevant.
[520]      
Mr. Ranot considered whether a blockage discount
on SHL’s direct and indirect CCL shares would be appropriate if the Lang family
chose to sell their shares in small quantities on the open market.  He
estimated the blockage discount to be 7% as at the valuation date in this
case.  Ms. White agreed that a 7% blockage discount, as opined by Mr. Ranot,
was reasonable.  She would have pegged it between 5-10%.
[521]      
Mr. Ranot also prepared a similar report on what
he viewed as being the blockage discount in the Le Van case for
comparative purposes.
[522]      
A voir dire was held because the
admissibility of Mr. Ranot’s report assessing the blockage discount in Le
Van was contested.  With some hesitation, I admitted Mr. Ranot’s testimony
and report.  In my ruling, I stated that I was not inviting a re-examination of
the issues in LeVan, nor was I inviting a view that went behind Justice
Backhouse’s decision or the contents of the expert reports.  I was admitting it
for the sole purpose of letting Mr. Ranot explain the totality of his thinking
around the blockage discount.  I stated I would consider what weight, if any, I
would give to it.
[523]      
Mr. Ranot concluded that a blockage discount of
20.8% was applied in Le Van to the Westcast shares owned by two
companies (RyVan and FWDAJ).  In arriving at this figure, Mr. Ranot relied on
certain information and documents, and on various assumptions, which were
attached as appendices to his report.  This included the expert report prepared
by Ms. Brent in that case (which report Backhouse J. preferred).  According to
Mr. Ranot, Ms. Brent did not breakdown what proportion of the discount related
to minority, illiquidity, or blockage discounts.
[524]      
Mr. Ranot explained that when equipped with knowing
a 20.8% blockage discount was proper in LeVan, it is evident that the
blockage discount was more of an issue in that case than the present.  After
subtracting the blockage discount from the 50% total discount proposed by Ms.
White, Mr. Ranot suggested approximately 30% remained for minority/illiquidity
considerations.  Therefore, it does not make sense to use the same discount
rate as LeVan in this case.
[525]      
On cross-examination, it was put to Mr. Ranot
that if a higher blockage discount were applied in LeVan than in this
case, is it not arguable that the discount rate in LeVan ought to have
been higher?  Mr. Ranot responded he was not trying to go behind the LeVan
decision.  He was simply trying to point out that when Ms. White compares this
case to LeVan, it is not comparing apples to apples.
[526]      
I appreciate the argument Mr. Ranot is trying to
make.  However, this court does not have any of the factual evidence in LeVan
that Mr. Ranot relied upon in his calculations of the blockage discount.  I
made clear that this court would not be undertaking a re-evaluation of the
issues in LeVan.  I cannot assess whether Mr. Ranot’s conclusions are
valid, and I will not re-try LeVan.